For now, I am going to leave most of my posts up, although I may turn off comments at some point soon. I hope some people will continue to read my writing if it helps them. I hope my most important points will shine through:
We have new atyou Spica Glitter pen colors! There are 11 new colors and Chocolate happens to be one of them. I really will take some photos of the new colors sometime soon, promise! Otherwise, you'll have to stop by the booth to see the other new colors.
t-shirt: Sears
When I entered the third-class carriage, I found it occupied by a man in a very loose overcoat and very tight trousers - so tight, indeed, as to give the casual observer an impression that they must be unripped at the scam before he could divest himself of that portion of his dress. This idea almost arose to conviction when one looked at his boots, which were the largest, the most creaseless, and more indicative of bunions than any which I ever noticed on the human foot. After these details, I need scarcely add that he was an omnibus driver, and, indeed, one by whose side it had often been my lot to sit when he was professionally employed in Oxford Street.
I realized a few months ago that I wanted more out of life then just working my little part time job.
This post represents one of my biggest coloring pushes: about four hours on-and-off, with the final couple of hours done nearly straight through. I'd wanted to finish the Frog tonight entirely, but I had to stop to let my hand rest. I will continue after I wake up: I want to finish this guy tomorrow, vines and all.
In actual practice, the most commonly used species concept is the morphological species concept. Quite simply, species are organisms that we can differentiate based on visible anatomical or morphological features.
In the inner cellar
There ARE a few rifles chambered in 20mm (which is about .79 caliber, and usually using aircraft cannon type ammunition with a solid projectile instead of an explosive shell) but they are very rare, very expensive, and very very hard to shoot; because of the massive recoil energy and muzzle blast they produce. They are essentially a curiosity.
I've been waiting for this Topps Mayo card for a long time. I was searching in a mad frenzy when 2009 Heritage was around. Then I forgot all about it until it popped in my head one day, like a puppy I lost long ago.
the weekend was gone!
YA
Jean shopping. IN FRANCE.
The Southern blonde held up the sign high and told her fans: ‘Get a good picture now, put it on Twitter.
plunged through the narrow space of his imagination
Born Lucy Renee Mathilde Schwob to a family of French intellectuals and writers in Nantes, Claude Cahun (who adopted the pseudonym at age 22) is best known for the staged self-portraiture, photo montages, and prose texts she made principally between 1920 and 1940.
Stick horses: I do not sew, but I really loved the idea of the kids having a stick horse and decorating it themselves. I found this idea on this blog, but I did not want to mess around with PVC pipe. I found another similar idea but the woman used yard sticks for the stick of the stick horse. Here is what I did. I found a horse head template, downloaded it to my computer, blew it up and printed it out as large as I could on a 81/2*11" paper. I traced it onto posterboard and cut it out. That first cutout was my template to trace the rest of the ponies. Of course, you have to trace and cut twice for each pony you will make. I simply bought wooden spindles from Joannes fabric (around 90 cents each) Once I had all my horse heads cut out I hot glued the spinle onto one horse head. Then, I hot glued the two sides of the horse heads together. Next, I used a hole punch to make the hole where I thought a bit would be and threaded inexpensive twine thru for the reigns. Easy! Each table had crayons, markers and googly eyes for decorating. I could not believe how big of a hit this was- kids from 3-8 years old all loved decorating and playing with these! yay!
Oh my blog, how I have missed you! I started this blog because I love food and I love to write. Somewhere along the way, I lost my focus. My blog started to feel like a burden. I felt I had to compete with all of the other food blogs who took way better pictures and devoted so much time researching the backgrounds of foods and experimenting with kitchen techniques I could never compete with. I started gaining weight and felt like a fraud writing about the French way of eating. I felt I needed to update everyday with new recipes, yet my health and waistline were not happy with all of that food. I needed to take a step back from my blog for a while.
“I will surrender my own life before I let you take this man’s,” he said.
I got to kiss the dolphin.
Years ago when women learned that their babies would not live long after birth, they were strongly encouraged not to bond with the baby. If you weren’t attached to something, you wouldn’t have to waste time grieving over it, and you could just get back to life after all was said and done. I’m not sure how someone could possibly have imagined that this was a good idea nor can I imagine being forced to deal with the loss of an infant in such a way.
I was at Sam's Club the other day & "stocked up" -- don't call it HOARDING -- on four jars of the creamy delight. Since each jar has 40 oz., I bought 10 lbs. of peanut butter ... the same amount that kept me alive in England all those many years ago.
And the valuable things appeared looking a little lost and bewildered. I had to nurse them to a safe place where those that belonged together had the reassurance of each others' company. Whether they were really valuable or simply objects of curiosity I had no time to tell. They just looked happier in their folders.
Here is the plot summary I gleaned from author Craig Silvey's own website:
This is a two-pronged pro-Pal. weapon and the NYT is assisting, it appears.
The ad, at least in my humble opinion, is perfect. It is all inclusive. Women are not relegated to the "girlfriend who is being ignored while her boyfriend plays Madden" as a recent Playstation 3 ad suggested, rather they are forces to be reckoned with. This is one of the first, if not the only game ad that acknowledges the existence of the "female gamer". Unfortunately, CoD: Black Ops only allows you to create male players, and many real female gamers like to play well, as females. At least this chick gamer does. But I guess I have to be satisfied with this baby step. Now if we could only stop the idiots from getting mental when they hear a female voice on the other end of the screen, we'd be making some progress. I swear, if I hear one more "how big are your tits" comment, I may take out my own squadron.
1/2 roasted sweet potato/cinnamon
Later, money became pieces of paper. They would consist of either words, stating that the bearer of this piece of paper was owed $100.00 worth of gold for example, and the holder could trade this paper with someone (usually a bank) for gold. After a while, specifically in the USA, the gold reserves were full, yet the people claimed they needed more money. The government decided to do away with “paper Vs. gold reserves” and simply printed more paper money, effectively devaluing all currency of America. The American money is now simply a piece of paper, stating its worth of X dollars. All of their paper currency is the same size, same colour and to a blind person, has no obvious differences from each other. Completely worthless, in my opinion, and literally, not worth the paper it is printed on!
I thought he wanted to tangle with Russo?
Paris convention and the Indian Patent Act, concluded that Bayer failed to work on the patent in the territory of India. He further said, “In the instant case, the Patent was granted in the year 2008. It is an admitted fact that the Patentee does have manufacturing facilities for manufacturing drugs in India, including oncology drugs. However even after the lapse of four years from the date of grant of patent, the Patentee failed to do so. The Patentee has also failed to grant a voluntary licence on reasonable terms to anyone including the Applicant herein to work the invention within the territory of India. Accordingly, I hold that Section 84(1)(c) is attracted in this case..”
I was already quite scared, and there was a car behind me, so I didn’t stop. I continued along 615 until a side road afforded an opportunity to turn off. The car behind me kept on going — Whew! No ul-Fuqra people were after me.
I regret your apparent mishap with the parking ticket this morning and the ensuing inconvenience to you. It is both unfortunate and regretable that you dropped it in your vehicle in such a manner that you had to suffer the 20 minutes of " digging and rolling around " as you put it in a failed attempt to recover said ticket.
Dear Lady who came knocking-
The vultures were devouring my beloved
her skirt
How in the ever living hell does a "Blogger Day of Silence" solve anything? Who believes that the people of Japan give two shits about whether I talk about what Disney movies I've enjoyed lately, or what outfit The Tofu Muchacha wore today, or what Jordan Baker thought about the latest episode of Top Chef? You know who believes the people of Japan cares?
1997: 428 deaths
Now, some of you may be saying, "Um, I don't see a comment from her!" And you would be right. And the answer to that is the following: My mom called and tearily says, "Jeanie just donated $100 because of your blog post. And she tried to comment, but she couldn't login. And well, just do it for her!" And so I did.
Participants should be young researchers, experts, NGO or Government representatives as well as academicians dealing with the issues of international security, foreign policy, regional conflicts and other related subjects.
I teach a primary 6 class, in a Belfast school, in a large council estate. Every morning I start the day with a poem taken a "poem for every day of the year" type of anthology. I read it aloud and then ask the children for a show of hands as to how many points out of 10 they would give it. Every class I have taught love this. They love poems that rhyme or those that make them laugh but many have also voted for poems they haven't understood but which they "just like the sound of". Throughout the year we cover a wide variety of poetry, some of which would sometimes be considered to be adult fayre, such as Shakespeare or Tennyson or Wordsworth. The children carefully listen and are really keen to offer their opinion on the poem of that day. On Friday I remind them of the week's poems and we vote again, this time for poem of the week. The winning poem is photocopied and is put on a small display area on the classroom wall. When the previous winning poem is taken down the children all argue about who can take and keep the previous week's poem.
Yet, she discovers a different kind of project upon meeting the man hired to renovate the house. Matt Jarreau is attractive and clearly wounded -- hiding from people, from God, and from his past. Kate can't help but set her stubborn heart on bringing him out of the dark and back into the light... whether he likes it or not.
me not now, not yet someday, maybe
On my bicycle, I was both free and potent. I'd ride across the school grounds and up a hill and imagine myself somewhere in the middle of Asia where the people looked like me. My bicycle was my steed, then, and I wore a turban and carried a sword and led my troops over plateaus and steppes and then stopped to eat by rivers on fertile farmland.
*the label maker is fun to use! And The Dewey Decimal System doesn’t hold a candle to our video organization with categories such as “chick flicks,” “high brow,” “spies!” and “classics” where you’ll find anything starring Will Ferrell, Steve Carell or Adam Sandler.
As well as the vague but generic desire to change society, there were more direct motives for such grandiose developments. For example, trade unionists on Sheffield council wanted to create municipal socialism and get back into power (1), by creating a new class of grateful client voters. Businesses also usually preferred to build anew rather than rebuild or restore, as re-development usually offers higher returns than conservation. There were often baser motives. In The History of Halesowen (2004), Julian Hunt relates how in the late 1950s and early ‘60s when the historic town centre was demolished for a concrete shopping centre, three of the local councillors were builders, and a fourth a demolition contractor.
Lee believed that we never stop growing, “There is no such thing as maturity. There is instead an ever-evolving process of maturing. Because when there is a maturity, there is a conclusion and a cessation. That’s the end. That’s when the coffin is closed. You might be deteriorating physically in the long process of aging, but your personal process of daily discovery is ongoing. You continue to learn more and more about yourself every day.”
As a GM, it's a classic horror-movie-style oneshot with deliberately meh pregen PCs who then become individuals because there are real people playing them who don't necessarily follow the script, and that's the plan. Only the in-character GMs try to railroad them like crazy, and it all goes wrong anyway. And then all the monsters in the rulebook break through the GM's screen and eat the game development staff. Or something. The analogy breaks down when the audience are also the stars.
I decided to do a digital layout
Once the written test is passed on Wednesday, Joshua will begin sending out resumes. Who knows what will happen from there. We could be leaving the islands in a month, in 6 months or even longer. We are not feeling like leaving is an emergency, so Joshua will be a bit picky in selecting a job. If one of the boys' health does begin to decline, then we will consider moving to the mainland, even if a new job is not set up.
Brasserie Dubuisson Frères sprl Bush Prestige
Why not skip your video email and have your speechwriters send out bullet emails to your digital attention-spanned twitterers to spam and harass those in touch with reality?
Tonight 3-6pm
Paper towels are my best friend when it comes to the bathroom. After I wipe and scrub the areas with the hand brush, I dry with paper towels that I can discard. I also like to hang on to worn out socks, or undershirts that I cut into pieces and use as disposable cloths. One pair of long underwear goes a long way! Cleaning your bathtub weekly is important as a ring can build up, making it difficult to remove.
Star Trek IV; The Voyage Home is entertaining, but fluffy. There is not any more plot here than in the last. What plot there is does not stand up to much scrutiny. Since the film does not take itself very seriously--David Marcus’ death is glossed over, for heaven’s sake--so I cannot analyze it too harshly, either. It is good to see a Trek story that does not resort to phasors and photon torpedoes to resolve a conflict as most of them do. For that, TVH gets kudos simply for being unique. It is a good time, but it is barely Trek. It was a big hit, but still not as good as a couple other entries in the franchise.
“Speedway,” she tapped the driver's shoulder and the carpet banked left and flew north, following the course of the White river until they veered away west. The majestic high rises of metropolitan Indianapolis shrunk over their left shoulders, but Speedway corner grew quietly and rose to a full crescendo in their sight. “Section C, anywhere in left central.” She wanted to walk a bit, maybe access some random towers and take meter readings of ion flow. The driver pulled up over the top of a public recreation center and Tina rolled off of the carpet into a catch funnel eight or nine meters below. She flashed her ident at the attendant as he gave her a hand up from the drop basin and he waved her off with a bow and smile. Tina beamed and both of their belts blinked with chasing blue plasms. So far so good, Tina thought as she stepped into a gravity well to the ground floor.
The new Spotlight on Neutrals Book by Pat Wys includes 12 projects with timeless appeal – quilts, pillows, table toppers a mantel scarf – all absolutely gorgeous! You can create stash-busting scrappy projects that can be used year-round and will work in any décor. Many of the featured quilts would be great for that special man in your life, and we are always looking for quilts appropriate for the guys!
6 Tbsp. (1 1/2 ounces) 1/3-less-fat cream cheese
2) The train is late, therefore there was snow on the tracks.
Beneath the foie gras snow we found cubes of buttery foie gras and two styles of apple: tiny apple cubes and wobbly apple jelly. I am not lying when I said people were fighting to lick the serving plate clean. I was one of them.
I have been sleeping my life away. Nothing abnormal about that. It’s the one guarantee I got these days…
89. Sehun used to be an ulzzang.
gluten-free meyer lemon olive oil cake
respecting someone means taking them seriously, holding them in a high regard, not interrupting them or belittling or dismissing their feelings. treating them as you'd like to be treated yourself.
Although day-time transmissions can be received on the higher frequencies, it was after dusk that the world seemed to truly come alive. "Lights-out" was never bedtime for me. It was only the beginning of my nightly travels. The BBC World Service was my first and daily fare, but "Tom Meier" of Radio Nederland, was my favorite, mostly for reasons of its strong signal relayed through their station in Bonaire, Netherlands Antilles. Radio Moscow punched through every band, and occupied what seemed to be the entire 41meter frequencies with their 200kw transmitter, holding up their end of the propaganda wars then raging. So strong and prevalent were they, they trampled and bled into more diminutively-powered neighboring stations that had the misfortune of living adjacent to them. Radio Kiev, sharing facilities and transmitters, was almost indistinguishable in brashness (unless one wishes to learn Ukrainian over the airwaves). Radio Habana Cuba, Peking Radio, Radio Sofia, Vatican Radio, and half-hour english-language broadcasts from every capital in Europe never failed to intrigue and fascinate as I sought to determine their location in my World Atlas.
When Frances and I got to the workshop there was a bird theme going on. Dougie had made a hummingbird lantern as an example and another girl was making a huge bird frame. The other weekend 'Plop - The owl who was afraid of the dark' came up in conversation so we thought we'd try to make a couple of owls that could be lit up for the procession. I have never worked with willow before and it was surprisingly pliable, but I did get a blister on my thumb from bending it into circles!
Photographer: Robert McLaughlin
JCS 2007 Ornament Issue
You are not smart enough, or cool enough to be here?
The next time some arrogant arse like Perry Hood of Lewes, Delaware arrogantly ignores all facts in order to accuse Republicans of raaaaacism because we disagree with Obama’s Socialist agenda, remind that arrogant arse just who the racists truly are. It’s the Liberals. It’s the Democrats (as shown in my left-hand side-bar). It’s why I have a link-list specifically dedicated to “race traitors”, a name Liberals give to all non-white Conservatives.
From the sea, we chilled on the beach, getting to know each other better and sharing stories from home and breaking cultural stereotypes. Once more we took to the sea, laughing as we asked to see Miss July and Miss October, as Ingrid got Nik to take pictures of her in the water. After another couple of hours chilling in the sun we decided it was time to make a move. The five hours on the road were well worth the four hours we enjoyed on the beach.
It's not yet on the BAILII database, but a two-man Court of Appeal for England and Wales (Lords Justices Longmore and Lewison) handed down its decision yesterday in Forrester Ketley & Co v David Brent.
MONEY. Don’t even get me started on this subject. 2010 is the year I will never forget. The year when my economic situation collapsed and all hope for the future went out the window. I won’t get into the details just repeat this simple notion: save before you buy. That’s what I should have remembered but I managed to forget. With willing aid of banks offering easy credit but still I did it all myself. Nobody forced me to ruin my economy. Now I’m learning to get by on a very small amount of money and finding that owning stuff is a bit overrated. Owning stuff is not a way to happiness. Happiness can be found without owning suff. Maybe it is even easier to be happy without owning a lot of stuff.
Of that or the next winter would be death.
After my meeting on Friday (still reeling from my dinner with these ladies the night before), Peggy picked me up at the hotel and we drive to her house. (Peggy is one of the two women that I met in AC Moore that day.) When I tell you that her house was chock full of crafty eye candy, I am not kidding. The whole house was decorated for Valentine's Day, including the bathrooms and the kitchen! I snapped some shots of some of the fun stuff that I saw while I was there. I didn't want to get carried away and risk scaring Peggy with my obsession:
Percieves the one in need.
Fallibilism is the philosophical doctrine that all claims of knowledge could, in principle, be mistaken. (Then again, I could be wrong about that.) The “open society” basically refers to a “test and evaluate” approach to social engineering. Regarding “open society” Roy Childs writes, “Since the Second World War, most of the Western democracies have followed Popper’s advice about piecemeal social engineering and democratic social reform, and it has gotten them into a grand mess.”
I have come across lots of really thought- provoking and interesting posts about motherhood on blogs lately so I thought I would add my two cents worth!! This is a post I have started to write so many times and I never publish it as I never started my blog to write about my day to day life and parenthood and all its highs, lows and challenges. I started my blog to share ideas as that is what I am passionate about- ideas, crafting, design, cool stuff, tips etc. I hate to think that people read my blog and feel they are less of a mum because they don't make all the stuff I do!
At birth, Ella is inadvertently cursed by an imprudent young fairy named Lucinda, who bestows on her the "gift" of obedience. Anything anyone tells her to do, Ella must obey. Another girl might have been cowed by this affliction, but not feisty Ella: "Instead of making me docile, Lucinda's curse made a rebel of me. Or perhaps I was that way naturally." When her beloved mother dies, leaving her in the care of a mostly absent and avaricious father, and later, a loathsome stepmother and two treacherous stepsisters, Ella's life and well-being seem to be in grave peril. But her intelligence and saucy nature keep her in good stead as she sets out on a quest for freedom and self-discovery as she tries to track down Lucinda to undo the curse, fending off ogres, befriending elves, and
These are significant areas which need to be addressed and managed well. I’m sure there are many more points which need to be addressed which the officials are tearing their hair out about right now.
A POEM BY DR. RAM SHARMA MEERUT, INDIA
Changing your life is HARD. Especially when you are an addict. It can be drugs, alcohol, sex, caffine... or food. My way of thinking after completing this cleanse has changed for the better, and I HATE it sometimes. I don't crave junk food, but I don't necessarily like the taste of healthy dishes. I have spent many sleepless nights thinking about recipes I used to enjoy and tweaking them significantly so they are healthy.
Last week after all that chat about the fruit trees a lunch in town was just what was needed...the blackboard menu was enticing and I (talking does make you incredibly hungry...) started with the chestnut soup, le velouté de chataignes, foie gras poelé...resisting the foie gras (the quickest way to gain weight and increase heart palpitations.. as delicious as it can be) and followed with le supreme du volaille, risotto aux morilles ...scrumptious roasted chicken and creamy mushroom risotto (not exactly good for the waistline either...but.....). The lunch was as good as it sounds.
House or Grey's Anatomy
English handout on copybook
Miller KP, et al. In utero effects of chemicals on reproductive tissues in females. Toxicol Appl Pharmacol 2004; 198: 111-131.
Krista with Saturated Canary is moving her shop from Etsy to her own online store, so you won't be able to grab any digis until she gets that up and running this week... but check in on her blog for the link! And you can always peruse her "sold items" in her Etsy store for a lookie-see at what all she's got goin' on.
inventive and to make my story fit in with the real world. It’s a challenge to my creativity, which is, after all, why I write in the first place. But there is also the joy of synchronicity - that moment when something you have newly discovered falls into place and fits so easily into your story, it’s almost as if it were meant to be.
1 dash vanilla extract
In living color
So come along to Mass in Blackfriars at 11am on Saturday 22nd, Sat of 2nd Week, for a Solemn Mass in the ancient Dominican Rite celebrated by the Dominicans. The procession starts from outside St Michael at the North Gate, the Saxon church in Cornmarket which stood next to the Bocardo Prison in the 16th Century, at 2pm. We will walk down Broad Street and Holywell Street singing the Litany of the Saints, the Te Deum, and English hymns, and back again to Blackfriars for Benediction.
Note: DO NOT add any salt to this gravy. I know it seems like everything needs salt, but this gravy does not because the ham juice is plenty salty.
Saturday dawned clear and bright and after a decent breakfast we headed up to the Glencoe Ski Centre admiring the stunning views during the short drive.
It's not my habit to write long posts and this one is already quite big enough so I'll end with a final favorite quote from Ishmael:
Pros: VERY black
Turn the heat onto medium or medium high and saute them (cook while occasionally stirring) until the water cooks out. This picture is about half way through the process. You'll notice that the bottom of the skillet is covered with water that has seeped out of the mushrooms. Just keep cooking past this point until most of that water has evaporated off and the bottom of the skillet is relatively dry. This should take about 5-7 minutes, depending on how hot your skillet is. You can prepare the custard (egg and milk mixture) while you're waiting for the mushrooms to finish.
The Seattle Seahawks hold the 11th or 12th pick currently in this years draft. Based upon team needs and analyzing other teams needs I now suspect the Seahawks will keep their pick (11th or 12th) and select one of the following players: Q. Coples, C. Upshaw or Melvin Ingram. These three players address immediate needs on defense. With that said here is how I think the Seahawks will use this years draft picks.
“Obviously I haven’t seen The Hunger Games yet, but I have read the books. I love a young adult story that celebrates a woman fighting and being independent, rather than just marrying the man being the whole point of the movie (like Twilight). The film is full of strong female characters like Effie, played by Elizabeth Banks.”
“But what if we were to kneel with cups under our chins instead of patens?”
Travel out of the US
I found Blogger, opened an account under a fake name (not completely ready to trust the internet) and started writing. College was all I'd known, so that was a good enough topic at the time. But as I became more and more frustrated with the career path I had chosen, the topics turned to self-introspection. What the hell was I doing? For as defiant as I was in everything else in life, I sure waved the white towel pretty quick when my parents limited my options for potential college majors. I gave in without a fight. Without doing my own research, even. And sure enough, the farther I got along on the path that had been chosen for me by those "who knew best", the more miserable I became.
DIRECTION
So, if you're willing to take advice from a fifteen-year-old, here it is: stop procrastinating today. Even if it's just for the day. Good luck!
My husband and I would later laugh countless times over the coming days recounting how Michael was shocked that Peter Elf could get the door wrong. And to add insult to injury, that the candy was mismatched.
Genuinely well-integrated Muslims gained attention during this period for the unusually cruel nature of their plight. Trapped as they were between the choices of a forced embrace of the mushrooming Islamic fanaticism in the ghettoes and the now almost-universal hostility towards them and their religion amongst other Danes, several prominent Muslims made high-profile exits from the country. It would be hard to say which side missed them the least.
Somebody enlighten me.
She sent me a preview of a couple of the photos that she took. I hope she doesn't mind me sharing one of them on here because it is just to fantastic not to!
- The winner will be chosen at random from the comment entries below
The Controller granted a compulsory licence under Section 84 of Indian Patent Act, 1970 to M/s Natco Pharma Ltd., Hyderabad for Bayer’s Patent IN215758 on 9th of March 2012. Natco’s compulsory licence would make the drug available to public at a much reduced price. The drug which costs patients around Rs. 2.8 Lakhs/ month through Bayer, would now be available to public at just around Rs. 8800/month.
For more information about the HSN “Pin to Win: Build Your Dream Room” Pinterest contest please visit HSN.com/Pinterest or join the conversation @HSN on Facebook and Twitter.
Now watch as your caramel does all sorts of sciencey things...gets lighter and bubbles/foams up a bit.
It’s a step in the right direction. I must add that I am not against making any kind of purchases. Rather, in this economy, we’ve got to teach our children about the importance of living within your means, being thoughtful about that which to spend your hard-earned money.
We had a storm in the south of Sweden this past winter that felled a lot of trees and made many people lose power for a month or more. It was severe but we had no looting, no guns going off, and no civil unrest among the people. Of course there were people here too complaining of the government efforts being too late and too small. Also the power companies got a lot of heat for being slow in getting power back on, and not spending enough to prevent storm damage to their installations. But the society did not fall apart.
The fact that it was the same disease that was currently ravaging my own father's body, was a cruel, ironic, parlor trick of fate.......
How is that even possible?
Best Middle School Book is Meet Christopher: An Osage Indian Boy from Oklahoma. Written by Genevieve Simermeyer, with photographs by Katherine Fogden, Meet Christopher is published by the National Museum of the American Indian, in association with Council Oak Books, 2008. It is the fourth book in the "My World: Young Native Americans Today" series, in which each book is written and photographed by Native contributors.
Here are my two cents on the matter. It’s the 21st Century. Originality in a musical sense, I feel, is all but dead. Unless you’re a psychedelic hardcore three-piece who incorporate jungle breakbeats and folk interludes with an accordion player, chances are the style of music you play has been done before by someone somewhere. I understand that some styles of music may be considered to be more formulaic than others, but deep down I think originality nowadays comes down to how and why the musicians in these bands write the music they do. If you’re letting record labels and external inputs affect your musical output, and shaping it into something that you as a musician do not feel is credible, then that is where the problem lies. Too many ‘pop’ artists these days are the shaped and manufactured products of greedy label executives and outside songwriters, and in my opinion that’s the kind of hollow and lifeless material that needs extinguishing. That’s not me saying ‘all pop music should be banished’, I love several pop artists, but I do think that the artists themselves need to be the ones taking the creative reigns, not the teams and stylists behind them. You Me At Six are a band that have tangled with the darker sides of the music industry: last year they released a track entitled ‘Rescue Me’ in collaboration with hip-hop duo Chiddy Bang which was vastly different to any of the band’s previous material. Whilst they pushed the record at the time of its release, later on in the year they revealed it was something they were pushed into doing by their record label EMI and that they wished to distance themselves from the track as much as possible, as it was not reflective of the type of band they wanted to be.
Other sessions
I’ve been developing some shots again today, and I’ll be doing the same tomorrow too. Hopefully I’ll get some good enough pieces to use in tomorrow’s blog post.
PRAAAANGGG…
I will continue with my commentary, but first I want you to watch the latest trailer.
We’re champions at simulating productivity while simultaneously doing nothing.
Like this one guy, he’s a police officer, he tried to arrest me once, he’s a Muslim, a “Moslem”, he’s an infidel anyway… He said to me: “The Prophet said we need to obey the law of the land.” I said: “Really? Where did he say that?” He said: “it’s in some book of hadith.” I said: “Okay, some book of hadith.”
So what does this mean?
But why is it that we can freely acknowledge that fast food and lack of exercise dull our bodies but ignore the detrimental effect of things dulling our minds?
He took hold of my hands and asked, “Ms. Heather, did I do a good job?”
On Wednesday night, one of the churches in our little town had a Freedom Celebration that we went to. It's always one of our favorite things to do to celebrate Independence Day. They give out free hotdogs, popcorn, pop and icecream and put on a fantastic fireworks show. They also have a great band on stage singing terrific old and new Christian music along with jupiter jumps and free pony rides for the kids. What fun! This year we talked our friends Dan & Rene into coming and I think they enjoyed it as much as we did!Me and the kids. Brooklyn can never resist putting bunny ears behind Grant's head!My sweetie pie and me!My two little trouble makers (i.e. the loves of my life!) My bestest buddy Rene and me!Fallon(the little girl I babysit) and Brooklyn.
And a few days ago I bought some new make up.
In her first race, a 5f MSW on 07/21/2011, she finished second by a neck to eventual G3W Believe You Can.
So, I headed back inside, still determined to get some satisfaction. After waiting yet again, I talked to the same Geek Squad associate, who then told me he had to talk to his manager. More waiting, and then he returns and tells me there’s nothing they could do. But if I wanted to buy another computer at Best Buy they’d be happy to do a data transfer for me. Oh my gosh. He is so lucky I didn’t jump across the counter right then. Really? A data transfer? That is the best you can do. I was willing to just let them send my old laptop out and repair it for me. I wasn’t pushing for a replacement. Just repair. But the manager wasn’t willing to do that for me. At that point, Best Buy went on my No-Shop List.
So in case you are thinking about jumping on to the latest bandwagon read up on the definition provided by Urban Dictionary:
Modern-day Leftist demonstrators too seem to be more interested in dramatic actions than in any coherent theory.
Rather it makes me want to live more simply, give more, save more, serve more, love more, value those who are dependent, both old and young, more deeply and work harder to provide good care for all.
"So then what?" I ask. "Through the desert?"
Since Virgin Atlantic launched their award winning flagship lounge in LHR in 2006, all eyes are turning to each airline’s lounge offering as a deciding factor in choosing business class travel. Air France has recently revealed details of its biggest ever business class lounge in the S4 boarding satellite at CDG, a joint project conducted by Aéroports de Paris and Air France aiming to make Paris-Charles de Gaulle an enjoyable airport experience embodying the image of Paris, the world’s leading tourist destination.
Elsewhere the much heralded Black Sabbath reunion seems to have hit the rocks (at least partially) after drummer Bill Ward posted an open letter to fans on his website saying "At this time, I would love nothing more than to be able to proceed with the Black Sabbath album and tour. However, I am unable to continue unless a 'signable' contract is drawn up; a contract that reflects some dignity and respect toward me as an original member of the band". There's a lot more and you can read it here but at the time of writing it seems the band's new album, headline slot at the Download Festival and world tour will not include Ward.
Let it set in the fridge for 1 to 2h (until it is set).
I suppose that's it on homestead news. I'll post a few garden pics soon.
But the young, young children, O my brothers,
Hi pretty girls!
This is another trailing plant called a ‘Tradescantia’. What you can’t see in the photo is that the leaves have an irridescent sheen to them and the underneath of the leaves is a bright, bright shade of purple – once the plant starts to grow and trail, it will look absolutely gorgeous (as long as it survives)!
I fell in love with this pattern when it came out last year, but I never got a chance to make it up. Yes, I'm making the blue one with sleeves in the lower right corner. I had to make a FBA, lengthen the waist, and add an additional 3" of length to the skirt, which, as you can see in the photo, is drafted rather short. The sleeves, however, had to be shortened by 1" and the rather wide cuffs also had to be decreased by 1/2". (Just call me T-rex!)
It resembles the seedlings of butterflies when one is falling in love with someone one knows one shouldn’t.
Risk Assessment for all borrowers:
In 2006, when the Commission was preparing a major new directive on ship safety, Vassalos and his team published a paper on the "post-damage stability" problem, entitled “Survival Criteria for Large Passenger Ships”. This was part of an EU project known as Safenvship (the details of which seem to have disappeared from the Commission website). In another paper, in 2007, they warned that “the regulatory system is stretched to breaking point”.
Anwaar and Fareda: Farewell, father.
-Francis
The SA border war ended – not by chance- in 1989, the year the Berlin wall fell, Tiananmen Square caused major restructuring in China, The Russians withdrew from Afghanistan and the USSR ultimately collapsed.
Allie is getting bigger and bigger and I love it!! I love chasing her around and playing with her! She's such a delight! She's finally putting herself to sleep now! She just needs her little seahorse and a cup of warm water to cuddle with. Yes, she cuddles with her cup, lmao. Crazy kid!
Last year's was the worst--seemingly interminable. Every class sang two songs, plus the school band and the orchestra did a medley--and we were seated on bleachers. The powers-that-be may have wised up this year--it seemed about half as long.
Brace yourself.
My particular favorite are matching games. I make most of my games, but have found several math games online for a price and for free. It's a matter of taking the time to look for what you want. I incorporate this mostly with my early finishers. I also find something that goes along with my lessons. For example if the chapter I am teaching is about division than the games the students play would be about decimals. It's an extension of the lesson and it makes learning more fun!
Oh, by the way, Happy Independence Day, Mr. President. I hope you’ve received the card President Obama sent you. I’ve got mine here.
Cardigan (Kersh, consignment), top (Oxmo), cami (Smart Set), skirt (Danier Leather, consignment), shoes (Poetic License), cuff (Grandma J's, vintage 50s, Renoir), earrings (vintage 50s, Renoir).
Dear Nursing – Degree,
-Hollis Bartlett
So now we know what Empire State Development Corporation (ESDC) Chairman Charles Gargano meant when he used the term “friendly condemnations” two months ago regarding the Atlantic Yards project.
14. Blasting Trough The City
You know when you see an image and suddenly you can't stop thinking about it? You immediately start to rearrange rooms in your head to make it fit into your life? You've stared at it for so long that you swear when you close your eyes at night you still see it?
We find the opening scene set in the famous painting, where two of the main characters are debating over who should take a look at the famous man across the counter, drinking his coffee alone and silent. This is a brilliant opening -- the characters trying to force each other to do the one thing that we, as viewers of the painting, have never been able to do, to discover the root of our intrigue, to discover literally who the man is -- forever out of our grasp as viewers of the painting.
I wish I had a valid/exciting reason for the lack of posts, but really? I don't. Life just keeps rolling right along (too fast for my taste) and I realized it's been a few weeks since I've posted. Nothing new here, working, doing the daily grind, spending time with the husband and dog and that's about it!
Well, I have a shoe to drop. There are a great many things happening right now in public, but also in private, and they are mostly not the enjoyable kind, but I am doing them nonetheless so that I do not freak out come November and December, when the lethargy of the coming winter really puts me in the procrastination mode. And after making a few lists of those tasks, and weighing them against my general available time to do them, I discovered the other dropped shoe.
Almost identical to “I mean” in English. This is used throughout Latin America. Some people use it in nearly every sentence. Bueno, no sé, o sea, que más puedo hacer? Well, I don´t know, I mean, what else can I do?
Basing his compositions on the anthropomorphic subject matter present in author Alan Aldridge's 1973 tale The Butterfly Ball and the Grasshopper's Feast (which in turn was inspired by an 1807 poem by William Roscoe), Roger put together a collection of songs about butterflies, mice, toads, and bats having a party in the forest. He gathered a bunch of his friends together to make the record, including the legendary Glenn Hughes, John Gustafson from Quartermass, Ronnie James Dio from Elf, the aforementioned Mr. Coverdale from Deep Purple, several members of the funk-rock band Fancy, and the entire The Mountain Fjord Orchestra. But it didn't end with a concept album.
After exploring Machu Picchu we headed down the mountain, had lunch in Aguas Calientes and enjoyed one or ten beers with the group before heading back to Cusco on the train. We were there for another day, then headed to Lima for our flight to Columbia. We are now in Bogota, where we are not having so much luck with the weather (there are constant torrential downpours), but we are enjoying the partying!
Eventually, though, I settled on a familiar subject matter that was near and dear to my heart: theatre. When discussing an art form, differences of opinion are typically welcomed and encouraged, so I felt comfortable in this genre. When I did try to persuade readers, I felt my points were supported by evidence. I tried to maintain a logical tone to my posts, avoiding the style of passionate blustering that plagues so many blogs. Readers quickly tire of rants, so I attempted to avoid going off the deep end with my commentary.
So what's happening?
As for the pumpkin cheesecake, also from Everyday Food, the recipe called for 4 bars of cream cheese, but thinking I'd try to make it lighter, I substituted 2 bars of cream cheese with plain yogurt instead. (In my defense, my usual cheesecake recipe calls for 2 bars of cream cheese plus 1 1/2 pints of sour cream ... and I've read that you can substitute plain yogurt for sour cream ... thus the yogurt instead of the cream cheese). Major fail! While the outermost area of the cheesecake was still tasty, the middle was way too soft - probably because of all the moisture from the yogurt.
“We heard your Christmas plea little one. You did not ask for earthly peace nor endless sunshine and cloudless skies.
Now if you have made turkey gumbo, good for you. But for most folks, staring at a carved, naked carcass wondering what to do with it, gumbo is an afterthought. To many of us it is the highlighted reason in cooking the bird. And whatever you do, do not discard any leftover dressing (Southern stuffing in a pan) as this is in my opinion the best pairing for this type of gumbo. We use the dressing instead of rice. Folks in other parts of the south, mostly Louisiana, serve their gumbo with potato salad made many times with Cajun mayonnaise. But it really don't matter what you serve your turkey gumbo with as long as you do, serve it that is. And make it from your saved turkey carcass for an incredible, rich taste.
They, and they alone, should be held accountable by the people who are their bosses.
So after much agonizing about what to make for Thanksgiving, everything ended up coming together easily.
The letter runs as follows:
NABC/O'Fallon/Schlafly C2 Collaboration Ale 10.7%
I ordered a rib eye steak cooked medium rare on the advice of the waitress. (any less cooking than this doesn't give the fat a chance to melt). Liam had the full rack of ribs that were just the same as mine but in a caveman sized portion.
*Which, I’d love to add a link to this but I’m still posting from my trusty but limited Droid. Apparently after 3 weeks it’s still too much to ask for AT&T to get their act together and send us the modem! I’ll drop this subject now, as anything further I have to say is highly inappropriate for a blog about writing for children.
On our way out of the garden I suggested she pick an onion for lunch. She was thrilled!
So there was a question asked on Facebook a week or so ago that asked about Blazer fan’s opinions on the future for next season. Well, I wrote a short opinion, but I will give my full opinion.
Voter identification laws passed through several legislatures in the past half decade frequently cause more voters to lose their voting privileges than frauds prevented. While there is no evidence of significant voter fraud caused by someone stealing another’s identity to vote — the only voter fraud voter identification laws is aimed at — there are thousands, or tens of thousands of people in every state where these laws are passed who cannot get suitable identification papers to vote.
Success inevitably attracts attention and opposition. During 2008, having been elected to the GLA and while also a councillor in Barking and Dagenham, I was constantly under attack, both having my house damaged again and being brought before the Standards Board through complaints initiated by Labour councillors. After I was elected as a member of the GLA, I passed the leadership of Barking and Dagenham BNP councillors on to the deputy leader of the opposition and became the deputy myself. By this time I was dealing with not only my own ward but with several other wards, as well as representing London on the GLA.
She would poop where she's never pooped before!
I imagine I’m speaking for millions of parents when I say I can hardly believe the passage of time.
I lost my passport/luggage Perhaps I can help you with that?
I started writing this post in October and did not really complete it as I was very frustrated with my experience. However, today I have clarity and would like to share with you my learnings. When I was refused the job, I guess it was in my interest. I had regular check ups and don’t know how I would have juggled work and my pregnancy.
I have had my first ‘winter cold/cough’ for the whole time also, but luckily I am the only one afflicted so far. The weather has been cloudy most days, I thought this would never happen, but it has. But it is still a very pleasant 20 degrees all day long, so last night for example, Erich took us out for dinner at a beachfront restaurant and we all ate outside with just t-shirts on.
Crowded House Into temptation NZ
Oh, God… how you love me
For the next example, let’s say that we have two carts that are initially stuck together at rest, then “explode” (via the spring in the plunger cart) and move off in different directions. Let’s make the carts have masses of 3 bricks and 1 brick.
It’s funny how you spend so much time preparing for one event, then that event happens, and there’s that letdown at the end. Oddly enough, I know I’ll be experiencing this once again later this year with my wedding. But for right now, I’m suffering half marathon postmortem letdown.
It's Martha filling in for Maria again. I didn't even think to check this weekend figuring Maria would have been back. We all hope you are recovering well Maria, please keep us posted!
One group of Canadians have celebrated National Beaver Day on the last Friday in February since 1974. They are the Nova Scotia Association of Architects, a club of builders any beaver could appreciate.
I arrived to work 30 minutes late. The weekend scheduler fixed it for me. They were giving pre-VGH yesterday for today, I booked to VGP (go home with pay early) for three o'clock. It was so slow, and a Saturday (no admin wandering around) I pulled out my knitting to work on between calls. At one point, I was able to complete a whole row on my snood and I call hadn't came through. I checked my phone to make sure I was still connected.
Fiona Meyers – Thank you so much for your kind thoughts. They really meant a lot. We are sad sometimes but on the upside we get to spend our money on travel and other things. It's not really the same as having a baby, but I'm trying to be grateful and gracious. That's all any of us can do.
Or maybe not so simple. I admit that the more I looked at Monzon’s work, the deeper the small works became. The paintings exist in an interesting place, in a fertile zone nourished by both the last thirty years of abstract painting as well as by some of most essential questions about how and what we see, how what we see is determined on how we see and what we believe we are seeing. For me and how I see the world, the paintings are split between the cynicism and critique of recent art history (sometimes a game of artworld insider wittisms which threatens to shut most of the human race out of contemporary art entirely) and what is really may be really at stake in the arts, the willingness to see the human as expressive, meaningful creatures. They are smart and tricky works.
of an 8 year-old again.
I was truly surprised at how wrong I was. The great selva, the forest of the Amazon, can certainly be mysterious and dangerous, but during my stay there, I felt one thing more than any other. I felt like I had come HOME. The vast expanses of Life Itself, surrounding me completely, sang to my soul and said, “You are home. You are life. You are Earth. We are life and Earth. Welcome home!”
In spite of it having been around longer than any other IPA currently available in the world, there's something inescapably 'now' about the recipe, and it could easily be mistaken for a recent offering from one of our more 'trendy' modern outfits.
collecting up the emptiness
I hope everyone has enjoyed my projects as much as I enjoyed making them. Big hugs to you all!
Back (l-r):
My Model: Jo
GREETINGS:
If I don't see through my window,
Combine water, sugar, and potato flakes. Add to starter. Stir well and leave on the counter overnight or all day (about 12 hours). I tell my starters, “Gather yeast, my little darlings!” but that’s not a necessary step.
Don't forget through the end of November you will receive 50% off all your images...what a good deal!
Total cost: $37.00
I wonder how many times the things we do have a positive affect on others lives.
You see… If you Trust in Him…
How lucky I was that I didn’t git murdered by her brother, them being Mexican and all! But do you mean murdered for what we did? There’s substantial evidence that we could’ve been.
The pain was so severe, I curled up in a ball and whimpered like a sick puppy. My tummy and chest hurt like hell and breathing was painful. To make it worse, a few people and a nenek who was brisk-walking witnessed the entire scene. She came to make sure I was okay and asked “Are you alright?”. I whispered, “I just need to lie down”.
In 1994, Black was convicted of three unsolved child murders in the 1980s - 11-year-old Susan Maxwell, from the Scottish Borders, five-year-old Caroline Hogg, from Edinburgh, and Sarah Harper, 10, from Morley, near Leeds - and a failed abduction bid in Nottingham in 1988.
The embargo states that neither American firms nor the coast guard could come to Cuba's assistance or provide equipment to help contain or clean up any oil spills.
This collection is now available for purchase. You can see the info on ordering and pricing by clicking the tab at the top of the page or by clicking here. You can also send me an email at pamsgirlybits@hotmail.com
As for me, I'm afraid I let my jaw fall open rather foolishly.
4. A haircut and maybe a color (that is really a dream since I am allergic to most hair color). However the latest haircolor trend of "bronde" really appeals to me for summer. What I really want is my long hair back for summer so that I can pull it back in a curly pony tail.
Stitched over 2 on 32 ct. Lakeside Vintage Light Examplar
If you let your muse loose with these images, play with them, study them in close up detail on your computer...there is food for a life time of creating.
I have several friends who have blogs and it certainly seems to be a good outlet for one's frustrations. So, I will stop by here on occasion and let people know what is going on with me and my life.
The God of love is my core, bedrock reality, the presence that I trust my entire being to and where I find my fundamental identity. I try to live out my faith, my deep trust in God’s love daily. Sometimes, I stumble, fall flat on my face, I get bruised and battered. The love of God picks me up, dusts me off, puts on a bandage or two and sends me on my way to be better than I used to be, to sin no more. This presence is with me constantly even when I fail to be the person I ought to be. This presence is with me constantly even though I will never be what I should be.
While Jashi screwed her eyes tight shut and curled her chin to her chest, Pevan squinted into the rushing air, spinning the Gate with her mind, focussing on making sure it went exactly beneath them. The thought of failure never crossed her mind. Long practice had the Gateway open and waiting before they were half-way down.
If you click on this thumbnail you can see a giant version of the panel.
Sergei slaps me on the back “If you want best tea, go see Ms. M’s uncle in St. Petersburg, the Bookmaker.” I glance over at Ms. M and she nods.
2/3 cup brown rice flour
I asked Dad how much he thinks would be needed and he said, 'Oh don't bug me with that' or something like this, so Mum and I calculated a bit, still to do more Math..
* My objective is to teach to students in a way that would enable them to gain relational understanding but I also think that there will be some instructional understanding. I feel as if the type of understanding used will be based on the school system. Further gaining relational understanding,in my opinion takes longer to grasp then instrumental understanding. So for this reason instrumental understanding may be used so that there is less time taken for each lesson. But in regards to this my ultimate is just to use relational.
Riddle Answer: A coat of paint.
So heres my list of things I can do to help whittle the time away and still be semi productive.
She didn’t. Instead, she threw him a coquettish smile he’d never seen on her before and closed the bathroom door behind her.
That is an age-old question. Cave men had it made. They firmly believed in kidnapping and taking their date to a filthy cave out in the middle of nowhere. Those were what was known as the good old days. Now days first date destinations and plans are a little trickier. First let’s cover where NOT to go on a first date.
What I want to do is hike on the land there, even if we can't go into the house. It's on a lot with acres upon acres of forest, stretching right up to the top of a mountain! There are deer and moose, and bear and wolves on that land.
Rewarded for winning the beer fight 25 times on expert level = The title “Battered, Bruised and Contused”.
The second project is the young adult fiction novel, Filling in the Gap, that I wrote about in an earlier post. I'm done with it, but am revising a final time. I entered the manuscript in a contest on Wattpad, an online eBook community. I haven't marketed it well at all, because I'm inundated with Other Baby Book stuff, but I think I have a shot at winning, if I can just get through the first round, which is the "popular" vote. From there, my pieces goes to judges.
So we go through the seasons of the year, the months, etc. It comes with cards for the special days, events, etc. We count the days and I added a little cards in the pockets. They came with the Question of the Day Chart that we have (picture below). They were left blank so what I did is to write all the subjects, for example, animals, colors, yes or no, etc. So every day when we do the calendar he can choose a card from the box.
the age of 18 by Catholic priests between 1950 and 2002.
Most likely, you have already been planning your Thanksgiving menu for a month but if you're like me, you may not have yet decided what delicious, compassionate dishes will grace your table this year.
In college I took a class on race studies. All of us white kids, we were taking the class expecting the black kids and the black teacher to tell us what it’s like to be black in America and be in those situations where there’s racism. And on the contrary, the teacher wanted us to talk about what it was like to be white in America, what it meant to be white and to really explore our identity. It was around that time that I began to really feel a spiritual pull, and an emotional pull from a lot of different directions towards Judaism. I decided, partially because of influence from that teacher and class, that I wanted to wear a yamaka. And let the outside world know that I’m Jewish rather it be a secret and something I keep to myself.
“Say, just when does your man Osbourne finish work? Can we still go see him there now?” he asked Geoff. Geoff checked the time, and saw that they could still catch Osbourne at work. So the two of them headed out and started walking towards the hospital. Trent was joking about how his date with Geoff's sister could have gone while Geoff was laughing it off and thanking Trent for saying he could still go with him if he wanted.
This papoose is not for giving away, I am hopeful that we will be blessed again someday and if you just fell off your chair after that statement, sorry but that really is my hearts desire. I am super happy with it. It is super soft and warm and hopefully will keep a tiny one content someday. Now I need to type up the pattern and get it tested.
He turned around at the mention of MM.
Your physical appearance turns her on: most women perfer muscle definition to muscle mass (move over, meatheads). Men with big, bulging muscles can appear threatening to a woman. We also know it takes time to build up those big muscles and that is time you won't be spending with us. We're looking for signs of not only health but of commitment too.
Above all, quacksalvers held out hope to those who otherwise could not be cured, or did not have access to care. They're still with us today: you can hardly avoid encountering them. (I call them "pharmaceutical companies", but that's a cynical post for another time.)
a new day … arrives with every dawn
I stamped and then coloured the fairies with my copics.
29.We Are The Union-Be Kind, Rewind
Boulder, CO (April 30, 2012) – A new report confirms the existence of suspected disparities in school discipline in Colorado and calls for further research as well as policy changes.
Information about reality is vital because without it we have no hope of addressing our problems as a society. In fact, in a culture of positive thinking, society has no problems — only people who persist in negative thinking have problems.
And what's more comfort foody than bread pudding? Nothing, that's what. Well, maybe Mac and cheese with meatloaf.
Albert raises Joey over a period of winters and summers. "His whistle," claims Joey, "imitated the stuttering call of an owl -- it was a call I never refused and I would never forget." Albert's father is sometimes kind, but is often nasty, especially when drunk. Because of this, Albert begins putting Joey in the stables with Zoey to ensure that he is kept safe during his father's drunken rages.
The world is a town in which inflexible people
From early on, I had accepted the fact that they were as much our children as they were people in their own right. They were real human beings, just smaller. We always felt that they should be given as much responsibility as they could handle; Make their own decisions; State their own opinions; Do their own work in their own time. Our job was to mostly keep them from hurting themselves.
‘But what about the reindeer?’ I hear you cry. Well, Ancient Norse mythology tells of Thor, the God of Thunder, who was known to fly through the stormy skies pulled in a chariot by magical goats (that’s right, magical goats) named Gnasher and Cracker. Suddenly Rudolph the Red-Nosed Reindeer (invented in 1939) no longer seems quite so bizarre.
10 Do you eat when you're not hungry?
A naturalist (if not a naturist) himself (he edits edits E/ The Environmental Magazine), Motivalli brings to this book not only a thorough understanding of America’s complex interaction with the wilderness, but a genuine literary bent, and a scholarly knowledge of American academic and popular culture. The book is at its best during those early chapters when Knowles is at the height of his notoriety. Less interesting are the chapters devoted to the three decades or so he lived in obscurity in the Pacific Northwest, although Motivalli gamely investigates Knowles’ accomplishments during these years as well, chiefly, his paintings, including a number of public art projects. But there is significance even here. While mostly self-taught, Knowles was not without skill as a painter. His works have more in common with great Americana artists like Audubon or Gilbert Stuart, than with the naïve or folk art you might expect. The final sections, which traces Knowles’ cultural legacy. Knowles casts a long shadow today, even if the image of the man himself has long since been shrouded in fog. Motivalli’s book is like a torch brought to Knowles’ obscure part of the forest, to reveal him in all his nakedness.
Then I had my Dr. appointment. They are every two weeks now. I'm 28 weeks and 3 days and am now in the 3rd trimester! So today was just the usual appointment, checking the heartbeat and my blood pressure and such. My Dr. said she wants me back next week because she has a concern (yikes!) She's concerned because my blood pressure was pretty high and also my sugar levels were high. But she confirmed that I'm not diabetic, so that's a plus. So next week they're going to check my blood pressure and sugars again and we'll go from there. So other than that everything else has been going well. The baby is moving around like crazy! Sometimes it feels like he or she is about to push through my stomach. I'm getting more and more excited about meeting this little angel inside of me. I dream about it all the time.
Recently I found out about a nine year old boy who'd started his own blog reviewing books he'd read. I had to become a follower because this is what writing for kids is all about, engaging with your reader and them wanting to talk about what they've read.
I kinda had some serious heart issues that resulted in two 5-day hospital stays on two separate coasts.
I also want to get a MacBook Pro for school, and I’m torn between the different models, sizes, blah and keep going back and forth between them all. I want it to bootcamp Windows 7 and OS X, so I know my only option is a MBP, but at the same time it must be powerful enough to play Diablo 3, Warcraft and whatever else I can cram down it’s throat.
There are others that seek zero alpha. The style remains consistent over time regardless of market conditions.
When I first started this job almost a year ago, some of the first things I was told I would need to learn, but only I could through experience, was to be aware of my surroundings and to be always watching whats happening around the bar, even doing so without making it obvious I am. More seriously then that though, I would have to learn how to handle the situation if a fight ever broke out or if a customer became violent and aggressive. Learning these things was never going to be the most fun aspect of the job.
Damages collected in such a suit usually pay for the cost of litigation. The parties then divide the remainder evenly between them if the infringement caused significant damages to the licensee.
Most people save cleaning and organizing for Spring and Fall, but what about the dead of Winter? With the calendar New Year around the corner, lots of folks are taking time to clean out their lives - getting rid of the things they don't need/want and making room to welcome in the new (possibly better) things. Some refer to this as Resolutions, but even without a name, this is a good time to review your life as is and decide if you'd like to continue the same path or make changes.
The B-Side is more of this totally weird, shitty microphones, distorted PA systems sound, I love that he's just freestyling with pump up banter like some kind of Bob Log pro wrestler.
Brenda Blethyn (Secrets & Lies)
in my mind.
TRUE CRIME MAGAZINE in 1936
But a rhythm in fleet feet
Another rejection......another heartbreak but it won't keep a good woman down!! I tried out for the Imaginisce design team but was rejected. Can't figure this DT thing out. But oh well, there will be other chances to try out and other design teams to try out for as well. Anywho.....I wanted to post my projects because I love them and wanted to share them with others.
-Did he yell at you?. I can’t believe he had the heart to hurt you. “
Somehow (?) this caused water to form and cover the whole planet.Umm, again, the water should already have been there, though possibly in vapor form depending on Earth's pressure and temperature prior to impact. Simulations I've seen at planetary conferences have actually shown that after the impact the Earth's surface was hot enough that, at least for a few thousands years, a significant component of the atmosphere was *rock vapor*. Whoa.
All right, last night was a first. My 9 year old twins planned, cooked and cleaned up the entire meal!
hoping they would take over a shaded area of our yard.
Pitalla/Pitaya/Dragon Fruit – Wow, what a healthy and versatile fruit that is! (Pitalla photos from trip to Nicaragua) Green Papaya Salad with Carambola (Star Fruit) and trimmings; Pork with Carambola Sauce; Carambola & Hibiscus Tea;(Prepared in Costa Rica) Hibiscus Gumbo; (Nicaragua) Hibiscus Tea, (Everywhere!) Maracuya-ITAS (Passionfruit) and Tequila,(Ecuador) “Popcorn Soup” (Carrot creamed soup with popcorn garnish) and Viche, ah, what an incredible seafood specialty from Manabi, Ecuador! The final image shows a new vegetable from Ecuador that’s locally called, ‘achocha.’ Mild and delicate, it is quite versatile in the kitchen. Used in soups, sauteed or stuffed – it also keeps well at room temperature!
So after some serious squash overload I went to my favorite go to place for recipes, blogs! While browsing I saw that Siri over at Siriously Delicious had posted one for Summer Squash and potato gratin. Gratin you say? Hmmm...I like cheese. Yes, gratin it is! Cheese is a key component to gratin. A quick trip through the fridge shows Emmental Swiss cheese, something the Little Witch picked out (she has great taste! What can I say?), a small chunk of mozzarella and as always Asiago. Those 3 cheeses sound pretty darn good together, the swiss for a robust cheese flavor, the mozz for the melting factor and Asiago has a pungent flavor that's just delicious.
Whatever the frequency is.. its showing as a quick flash into the high RF.. and as the flash intensity increases .. so does its geometric modulation appearance on the screen — ultimately the higher and more frequent the flashes = the stronger and longer lasting the storm that comes to the flash.
Fransisco Alejandri’s Kensington market stall
It's hard to choose any one track for sample... but I enjoyed the lounge cover of By The Time I Get To Phoenix.
“How do you know my name?” Alice asked. It was this, rather than the fact she was sat, riding on the back of a mythological creature, that most concerned her.
The STAR Skills Academy will take place from 11th-14th June 2012 and is open to all students. Sessions, happening over 4 days, are interactive, fun and challenging and are run by graduate recruiters and careers centre staff.
Hello, Monday! I moved my wardrobe column over here on Monday from Wednesday as I wanted to start an interior design topic related column on Wednesdays. I like Mondays, but I know that Monday is not always a welcomed day of a week, so I thought that fashion might give a good kick-start of a new week.
Apathy: No-one seemed to notice - or care - when ICI was snapped up by the Dutch
Thank you to all who linked up to last week’s party! I can’t wait to start seeing some inspiration for New Year’s Eve and Valentine’s Day as well as more Winter inspiration. It’s a great time to share resolutions and organizing tips as well.
This used to be a pretty relaxed day as people rolled into town. This year thanks to Battlefoam‘s free bag give away to the first 500 attendees to register, it was pretty crazy with huge lines in the afternoon. I didn’t get in until 6:30 and didn’t go down to registration until after 7:00 but there still was a line around the corner. This was the tail end of the rush though and it took less than 10 minutes to get through the line and get the huge swag bag.
The “M-plans”: The secret strategies the media has put in place to report the future death of Nelson Mandela. http://bit.ly/rM3PuK
are the best?
So thanks to the kind folks at October Afternoon our first two CHA Blog Candys will be a set of papers from either of the new ranges due shortly, leave a comment and we will pick two lucky winners who will win either "5 & Dime" or "Rocket Age" and will be first in the UK to get them...even before we have our delivery !!!
11pm - Oak Street Blues
It’s also then that we truly understand their love.
But then I reframed it.
Won't be as bitter as the ones behind you.
First up is Team Cee Lo. Between Jamar, Juliet, James and Chessa. He pulled out his blackberry phone and reads a speech he wrote, an apology and message of love. He really seemed emotional. He told them not to lose contact with him after this, but tonight, due to performances he let James Massone go. Damn. Cee Lo said “I got you” over and over. Does that mean there may be something in the works for James?
What does 5 UK boys, X factor and wailing fan girls have in common? That’s easy, it’s One Direction.
3. Desperado 3:49
Teva argues that, even assuming the Warner-Lambert scientists did not know how to stabilize Vasotec®, the patentees still committed inequitable conduct because claims 16 and 17 nevertheless read on Vasotec®. This, according to Teva, is because the claims simply require "contacting" an ACE inhibitor with a metal carbonate and a saccharide. Teva also points out that the originally filed claims were not limited to carbonates, but merely referred to "alkali and alkaline earth metal salts," and that this court’s decision in Schwarz Pharma construed "carbonate" to include "bicarbonate."
It is my stated position that decriminalization in the U.S. will arrive via judicial fiat, just as abortion and other sexual rights did; the political establishment won’t even let the issue onto the table, and prohibitionists dump millions per year into confusing the public with “sex trafficking” hysteria and myths about pimps, disease and “degradation of women”. But courts aren’t supposed to take public opinion into account when considering issues of individual rights, and many (perhaps even a growing number) do not. This story from July 6th tends to support my view:
In this reflection on the beginning of Jesus’ mission-activity, we hear a brief description of him being tested. What does that mean – to be tested? In this instance, Jesus was led into the desert, where he was exposed to extreme heat and the danger of wild beasts. In other words, it’s an extreme situation where the usual human resources for life and relational support were missing – he was isolated and in danger and help was not readily available.
A Knocknarea with for navel a cairn of stones,
The multiplayer is worth a solid investment alone. It’s powered by a huge amount of customisation, with rewards and incentives always in the near distance for you to strive towards. While you can choose from one of a few default classes, Crysis 2 allows you (in most modes) to create your own class by selecting from a variety of weapons and suit modules. These modules are many and may allow for faster firing rate, automatic warning when enemies come near, radar scrambling, among others. Public matches offer variants in which, for example, time between rounds is reduced or you don’t get any nanosuit abilities. Private matches afford the host control over aspects like friendly fire, score limit, respawn delay, and much more.
“Don’t worry about me, Grace, I’ll be fine. We will win the war, and then we can be together again. Just give us some time.” He lies to her knowing the United States is out matched. Trying to lie to himself, convince himself its true. He will go down fighting, he is no coward.
According to those in the know, the ad makers may have picked up the concept from Ranbir’s smart-phone, as he had his Barfi! look as his display picture for a while.
Halfway between San Francisco and Los Angeles on California's stunningly beautiful central Pacific coast highway sits the rugged seaside tourist hamlet of Cambria. It's six miles from Hearst Castle, an awesome place we've blogged about previously and in Cambria Village, you'll find the Cambria Village Pharmacy, where, among the Band-Aids, foot powder and Calamine lotion, reside over 400 variations of rubber ducks. Plain yellow, black leather jacketed, glow in the dark, or celebrity-themed, they're everywhere, waiting to be purchased and floated in a tub near you. According to store manager Loren Empey (in this Trazzler article from 2009), the ducks began about a decade ago as an ordering mistake and now occupy half the store, making the pharmacy one of the world's foremost suppliers of the little yellow guys and all their peripheral gear.
Monday has given me a terrible headache. No joke. As I type, every click of the keyboard makes my temples throb. I can't take the "Excedrin Migraine" med that ALWAYS stops my headache because my pain didn't start until 8 p.m. If I take my favorite over-the-counter, I will be up all night long. So I have to settle for Grocery Store acetaminophen. Yep. Which means I'll have a headache all night long. Sigh.
“Everyone on the ship was saying every day, look at that view! Look at all that water! All I wanted to say to them was it’s great but I see it every day. It just needs a mountain in the back of it. Don’t get me wrong, it was beautiful but all they have is palm trees. All I could think was how beautiful it is in Vancouver.”
* Keep the sensitive portions of the encryption process (your private key) tucked away… as this is one of the more fruitful ways for someone to break encryption (compromising private keys)
I love to laugh, I love to meet new people, I love seeing people grow and believe in themselves, I love challenging myself, I love travel, photography, singing.. particularly in the car miles from anyone….I am excited about agriculture and what is involved in producing food, I am so passionate about creating relationships between the producer and the consumer. I love family and community and I absolutely love life. I will leave this planet a better place then when I arrived!
Here is another...
You're gone. Vackie's acting weird. Where are you? Why won't you pick up my calls? Why won't you answer me?
The human traffic eased towards the 8th km. So did my mind. Now, I decided, was the time to recover, to compensate for lost time. I began to accelerate.
‘Porcelain is distinguished by its hardness resilience and translucence. It is made from Kaolin, a fine white clay mixed with ground petuntse, a clear glassy material. When fired at high temperatures the petuntse mets and surrounds the kaolin particles, forming a unified, vitreous object. This glassy quality gives porcelain tow of its most cherished qualities: its resonance—it rings when tapped and its translucence. It is often called china because of its Chinese origin.’
Hi to everyone outside in this world. I'm Kate and I'm telling you stories of my daily life, of fashion, of religion and other stuff maybe every day. So join me and see what I have for you. ;)
150 i
Best phil&teds Smart Buggy Bassinet and Stroller Bundle, Black Collections
Me: I have to go. *click*
When this conversation ends, it will all be over.
I'll leave this up for a bit before I change it. But I will admit that I am kinda anxious to post pictures!
Rob Rossini, the city’s general manager of finance, told councillors that his department has already allocated $2.7 million out of the waste management budget to put towards road repair. If council votes for the 1.5 per cent infrastructure surcharge, that revenue will be over and above the $2.7 million from waste management.
Where does this all come from? What is it within us as a human species that has allowed things to get to this point? What can I do? I first feel that we must claim our personal responsibility in our own personal life. I also believe that we are all capable of everything. If someone can strap a bomb on his personhood, walk into a crowded lobby and blow himself up and everyone else around him, then I am capable of the same act. If someone can pick up an assault rifle and walk into an office or school and kills as many
When you see it in the context below I can see why locally there was a fair amount of opposition to the development. Why people feel the need to build flats there and ruin such a beautiful landscape I'll never know. They have also had to dig into the cliff side to squeeze in all the buildings.
I don't think people find it easy to meet up with anyone who is having a close brush with death. I think its not in our culture. "If I don't have to talk about this, I don't have to face up to the problem of cancer."
With the PackAttack at KC, expect large production out of Rodgers and J. Nelson. Combine that with the poor defenses of TB, NE, and Min lined up against some of Rodger’s all stars, and its safe to say 169 may be an understatement. Team Determination showed promise towards the end of the season, just clinching the last spot in the playoffs during the last week. However with a majority of his players at defenses of the Jets, Bears, Cowboys, Lions, and 49ers, there is not much hope. The much struggled for extension of a season ends for team determination immediately.
The result was that the Yeti of Tajikistan were subject to institutional speciesism, and soon embarked on the Great Lollop (Yettish: Tümőnt'z Nyi'ařl) - a mass migration across the cordillera to British India. Their spiritual leader, Yebhamoth the Marmot-Slayer, shaved closely and enlisted in the 5th Baluchi Lancers, with anti-Soviet vengeance on his single-lobed mind.
So maybe you did make it past all the obstacles of color, formula, and brand (oh dear lord, don’t get me started on brand. Did you know that there are blogs out there to compare the same products of two different brands and conclude that they are in fact the same?). Done right? Now you’re all pretty and perfect?
---psssst....bookmark this page on your guy's computer! Maybe he'll get the hint!---
Crawling, wriggling in my mind.
CORRECTIONS: I made a big blunder in this episode. I've always prided myself in New York movie trivia, yet I flubbed it in this episode. 'The Godfather III' was filmed at St. Patrick's Old Cathedral, not at the new one. Sorry for the error.
Unfortunately, the chronological blogroll (Good and Hot) is ailing. About a month ago, some clever programmer at Google touched the code that updates gadget contents and broke it. Since then, I have been unable to add, update, or delete links. Since the listing is chronological, old or dead links automatically sink to the bottom (where they will cause no trouble). However, not adding new blogs is a more serious problem. If Google is fixing these bugs, or even developing a work-around, they haven't told us. For now, there seems to be a new effective maximum blogroll size of around 170 links.
Are we talking in life in general or...? Oh, forget it. To give, of course, to give.
He needs a blanket party. One that goes to the very end.
MORALS: Nope. None in there.
This wine is a combination of two of my favorite things: Watermark Restaurant -Nashville & Pinot Noir. Amarone is my #1 favorite wine but a very close second is Pinot Noir. It is interesting because they seem to be on the opposite ends of the spectrum. Amarone is bold, thick, rich, earthy, late harvest almost port-like while Pinot Noir is subtle, light, complex. I prefer the barnyard, old world style of Burgundy.
Friday’s prime time once again started with a men’s volleyball match pitting Japan against Russia, which ended in a result of a 0:3 loss and an ordinary rating of 10.3%
Let me answer that in a slightly roundabout way by looking at another question first: Why did American "progressives" believe what they did in the early 20th century? I have already documented what that was at some length elsewhere so I will just summarize here: The Left of American politics from the beginning of the 20th century up to FDR and the "New Deal" were essentially Fascist. They believed in eugenics, in nationalism, in national uniformity, in war as a purifying force, in the inferiority of Jews and blacks etc. Nowadays the American Left rejects all that with apparent horror (though the antisemitism does seem to have roared back with a vengeance recently). So how did THAT huge change in doctrine come about? The explanation is a psychological one. As we have seen, psychological explanations for conservatism (e.g. Norton & Aughey, 1981; Gilmour, 1978; Feiling, 1953; Kirk, 1993, Scruton, 2002, Standish, 1990) are routine (though Leftist accounts of conservative psychology are amazingly counter-factual) and I think Leftism also has to be explained psychologically.
I am a closeted potty mouth. As in when I am in an enclosed space surrounded by moronic motorists, the words really start flying. Or if I am typing in cyberland I guess, but my kids can't read curse words yet so I think I am good.
I also am already taking steps to develop myself as a writer, and am looking forward to sharing some of that here as I go.
Recently, I just self-pubbed my short story, called A Conversation Before Dinner over at Smashwords. So far, I have received one very nice five-star, unsolicited review. Here is a link to the talking animal tale, which happens to be a free download.
The procedure before the Committee is very much in the hands of the Chairman. In this Case Mr Whittingdale, MP, decided that the way to operate was for each member of the Committee to have an allotted period to ask the questions they wanted to ask. Effectively therefore the Murdochs faced 9 or 10 separate prosecuting counsel, all asking questions about different areas. There was however no cohesion in the process, and points were returned to, and gone over more than once, even where it appeared to an outside observer, that the matter had been dealt with already. Each MP on the Committee however wanted to have their chance to question the Murdochs, as was their right, even where that questioning did not really advance matters at all. Only Tom Watson MP, who has been pursuing the phone hacking matter for a number of years, really took the Murdochs through a detailed and logical questioning proves, and it might have been much better if he had been allowed to continue asking questions on behalf of the Committee, but the members were not willing to give up their own chance to interrogate. In fact, the most telling moment of the proceedings, excluding the pie attack on Rupert Murdoch, occurred at the very end, when the Chairman permitted Mr Watson to ask a supplementary question, as I will refer to below.
When you're doing the "fever" thing - the really good one, the past 104-degree one - the up-past-midnight, mopping of the overheated brow with the cold compresses, the checking the temperature every ten minutes, the exchanging furrowed-brow looks with the spouse...that one?
Hey there! Hope everybody had a great weekend. Mine started out pretty good and ended with a migraine from hell!! We went out with a few friends on Friday night. Saturday I got up and felt fine (I was a good girl the night before). Took the family and headed to the Italian Fest....then the headache started kicking in. By the time we left there I went straight home, took some tylenol and crawled into bed. I stayed that way for a few hours. Woke up and I felt a little better. So I watched some netflix and did a little crafting until 3 a.m.!! haha Not my usually bedtime, I will tell you that! Needless to say I was up bright and early on Sunday morning because it doesn't matter what time I go to bed, I will be up the next morning early!!
6. Books for children to read since there will be no TV or internet and they will be frightened. Recommend lightly-themed books with happy endings.
I’ve been opening minds, eyes and hearts since this tragedy. I know some people are glad I’ve taken the “burden” upon myself. Hell. They’re my friends. I love them. It’s the least I can do. I will be glad when I stop making people cry, choke up, or get misty eyed. But that’s how it is right now. So I keep interjecting humor in many other areas of my life, and even in some of the more dire moments. Dry wit doesn’t quite counteract moist eyes, but it doesn’t hurt much either. Those folks who’ve only known me for my “game” face, all serious and full of concentration, have been, I think, pleasantly surprised to learn that I have a heart. Over the years, I’ve heard that I can be rather intimidating. I guess you might just have to get to know me. Or maybe I could lighten up a bit more.
Who would have thought to put these two activities together in to a workshop? Natalie Goldberg actually.
Otherwise known as... Who Needs Batteries?
and the tricky thing about shadow is... the more we think about it, the
Is nor of heaven nor earth, for these are pleased.
California dreaming/scheming
But readership is down for print media, and ad sales are down even more sharply, driven by shifts in reader habits and an overload of information that hardly allows us to absorb an ad, much less clip it. In Sunday’s Chicago Tribune, the SmartSource advertising insert and the P&G brandSAVER are still hawking food and toiletries alongside big box flyers. So the print-marketing paradigm is still being applied.
I asked one of my new friends, “When am I going to meet Ferne?” He looked shocked.
I had occasion to share my testimony at church a few weeks ago and that was one thing I told the congregation from my personal experience. When you set out to find God, He will meet you more than halfway. His love knows no bounds for you. Yet who is the very essence of majesty, holiness and dignity? If you haven’t already, turn towards God and ask His forgiveness. Then feel His love wash over you.
6 good looking gentlemen, 6 distinct voices, A cappella music, talents on show, originality…seriously, what’s there not to love about this group. Finally, Take 6 are back! If you are like me who’s always loved pure genuine gospel music, then you would have been following Take 6 from the beginning. With their contemporary style, integrating jazz and R&B, these guys celebrate and share with us a work of art and a work of heart.
These pictures are from the midnight premiere of Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows Part 2 and from when I dressed up for Halloween this past year as a Harry Potter geek! I will add my initial reactions and a short review below. I saw it three times the opening weekend, twice in 2D, once in 3D on an Ultra-Screen…
Seriously. It was a bad work week.
Now, how to build the cupcake cake?
Remember, your first tag should be the same as your last tag; in other words, if you start with a bold tag, then end with a bold tag.
2. I have two kneecaps in my left leg, and none in my right.
I will definitely be finding a new full time job..... I'm not one to sit in one place for a long period of time.
It sounds like education and learning are going very smoothly in this family with hardly any friction at all.
The following pics show both our kitchen and the big table in use at a recent gathering of my family - my parents, sisters, respective spouses and children.
I have tracked down a number of them, and I am super psyched to get them all on this blog, but I don't have the energy for that right now. Instead, I will use this post to present an album taking only one listen to earn a place in my superfantastic list (this list has in no way existed or will, but it is still f-dang real), and has inspired me to seek out as much of Sean McCann's work as time and luck will allow.
alongbine: Listen sorry but gonna sign off because I have to stay on this call. It’s my bro who no-one in the family has been able to get hold of and have been concerned about due to a recent marriage break-up.
Tohoshinki Dancer’s Team! You were the best! We should be the ones thanking you, thank you for moving us!!
Work in small room for between 11 and 12.5 hours, including 5 minutes for lunch if the phone doesn't ring. Try to avoid using freezing cold toilet in outbuilding lightly spattered with turkey blood unless absolutely necessary.
Boil the noodles for 5-8 mins until softened, then drain well.
We also had twice weekly milk delivery. We would go out in the morning and find the fresh bottled milk sitting on our porch. We never ran out.
Dates: Jul 2-Aug 10; Age/Grade Range: 2.9-6yo
Domestic Violence: The Florida Requirement- Describe the impact of violence on health care and how “domestic violence” is defined. Cite the general prevalence of domestic violence on a national and state level and identify state laws pertaining to the issue. Describe how to screen individuals who may be victims or perpetrators of domestic violence, including the importance of conducting a culturally sensitive assessment. Identify community resources presently available for domestic violence victims and their perpetrators throughout Florida concerning legal aid, shelter, victim and batterer counseling, and child protection services. 2.0 Free CEUs (all specialties) Expires 7/31/12
And, remember that yarn I showed you the other day? While packing it up, I realized just how much I have.
In his first interview since standing down, Mr Jasper said: "I've been approached to say whether or not it would be something I would consider to stand as an MP, particularly in Vauxhall.
Poo Poo:
Sorry I haven't been blogging much. Life has been insanely busy with work and wedding festivities. One of those wedding festivities was a bridal shower hosted by my bridesmaids and my mom at my parents' house two weekends ago. My grandparents, Mimi and Pappaw, drove all the way from Florida to attend the shower. It was wonderful.
Today, I was accosted with the worst pick up line EVER. While I was smoking outside, this fellow came up to me and said, "I've only ever seen you with a girl. Are you a lesbian?"
The grunt of idle machinery, the neighbors’ alternate voices and local radio gibberish, and bloody scums cantering like telestatics – cacophony!
“The man made me drink his blood… I saw him in that place with the gates and the disinfectant and then they were after me. He cut me.” She held her hand out and it trembled between them, fluttering in time with her heart. “I just want to go home. I want this nightmare to end. Please? I can’t take this. Please?”
The wise old saying, “Beauty Is Only Skin Deep” , applies equally to you medallion men too.
which comes out in May, will launch simultaneously with a line of OPI-created polishes. And lest you get bored and think movies are only branding themselves in the nail-centric section of the beauty department, Universal Pictures and HSN are partnering on full collections of beauty, fashion, and housewares in conjunction with the June release of Snow White and the Huntsman.
Best moment this week: On Wednesday, we had our ultrasound and hearing that you were healthy was the best feeling I have had yet!
6 (6 ounce) ramekins
Interview them to see whether they would fit well with your team, and check their references to confirm that they really are as good as they appear to be. Then discuss with them your concerns, whether that is doing work below their experience level or that they might leave quickly when another opportunity opens up.
Bazzill
there is yet faith and the love and the hope
Building knowledge blocks with numbers of the progeny
5. Skin City (02:52)
Not only will end zone celebrations be banned, but any type of celebration on the field at any time will be banned. This includes, clapping of hands, slapping another player on the buttocks, jumping up and down on the sidelines, or dumping Gatorade on the winning coach. Additionally, "trash talk" between opposing players will be banned. Players engaging in this type of behavior will be subject to penalty, fines, and classes for sensitivity training. The gubment commission is most concerned about players getting their feelings hurt which would result in more taxpayer funded counseling for the sniveling players.
Though each wave generates a good deal of enthusiasm and some affection, a negative image of the anarchist still prevails. The alter-globalisation movement and organisations like Reclaim the Streets encouraged an association with party-going carnival "fluffies," but the bearded, bomb-throwing terrorist remains a powerful trope (witness the character "V" in V for Vendetta), and the balaclava of urban youth, the punk and the eco-warrior are modern takes on it - search for ‘anarchist’ on Google image search and see what appears.
1. “Even when I lose, I win, because I never lose the lesson.” (Great for an upbeat character)
recording quality: B (pretty good for this era,
Rob laughs, "He wishes"
than one out of every three
Then we got the news that our case is still being played around with- one would think that wouldn't be possible at the U.S. Supreme Court level. WRONG!! All the families involved are about to come out of their skins, and the husbands are discussing risking imprisonment to get the truth revealed. We need a revolution. To top it off, uninformed fellow believers have criticized us for our circumstances, without asking for the details to help them understand. No way did I ever think I would be living this ordeal. After a college education, starting a Christian school in a foreign country, and raising two great kids- never did I think I would be walking this path at this age; fighting for the basic rights that most Americans don't even realize they have, they are so natural to them. But not to us...
+1 for tweeting or posting on facebook about this interview
Leaves you where you began
Sturdy Cardboard- I used foam poster board from the dollar store.
Jen talked to her barn owner and got a (begrudging) agreement to take in a 16.3 overgrown kid for a month. I think she knew how much fun Jen could have with Granite and she loves Jen and wants her to be happy (who wouldn't). Heather (our trainer) and our barn owner (and farrier too) all agreed that this was a great opportunity, so we started making our tactical plans.
But who comes out as HORROR CHAMP SUPREME??????? Let's do this!
"My name was Melissa Jane." I thought about my verb tense as I said it but decided to roll with it.
Part of the cheering crew ready to head home.
I’m afraid of my girls getting hurt. They love CBG like anything. They’ve already lived through my divorce from their dad. I wouldn’t want to do something like that to them again.
21. Voodoo Voodoo - LaVern Baker
good health
5. Eat, and enjoy!
Some visitors came searching, mostly for fish spa, jetstar, back brace, bbq pork, and vipin vohra and viva global.
( To finish up the idli batter, made dosa like small pancake).
In April two female police officers were arrested in Tshwane after 126 stolen rape files and evidence files were found in their possession and an employee at the Pretoria forensic laboratory described the problem of uncollected kits as a "national tragedy", the report read.
In a debate about what, exactly it was, half of Monday’s crew thought asbestos, and the other half thought some sort of fiberglass.
“Amazing after all this time,” Xu Guan thought to himself. “How could a building like this have gone unnoticed? How could it still remain as it had been months before when the world came to a screeching halt?”
So here’s the deal with the rooms. My aunt, who had just turned 70, was invited to stay in the guest house where there would be a real room, with real beds— two to a room— and a real bathroom just down the hall. But I, who had not just turned 70, would not be able to stay with her there. I would have to go sleep with another group somewhere else. My aunt did not hesitate. “We want to stay together.” In that case, we had two choices. I could sense that Jean-Patrique was really going out on a limb for us here; although the brothers endeavor to greet all as Christ, they have a firm rule of no special favors. All must be treated equally. It’s the only way community works. We were given an option of a dorm that was close to the other adult quarters that we would share with a few other people, or a room that was “a bit removed” from the main area that we could have to ourselves. “We’ll take that one,” we said and delighted in the fact that, at least according to the map, we would be off in a stretch of rooms that bordered a private park with walking trails.
d) The prohibition for the Defendants to cite, analyse or comment, verbally or in writing, on parts of the book or the video that defend the thesis of death of the third Applicant or of concealment of her body by the first two Applicants;
or, Why I Hate Fanny Price
Has me struggling till the dawn
If you knew the deceased, talk about him. The bereaved (a terrible word, so namby-pamby and doesn’t really connote how truly bereft one is after such a loss) will find comfort in your memories. If you didn’t know him, you can talk about your own experiences with the death of a loved one, though be aware that grief piled upon grief might be a bit overwhelming for the one left behind. Despite that, the stories people share with me make me realize that though the pain seems impossible to live through, it will eventually become tolerable. At least, I hope it will.
Yvette Cooper told the BBC her party had not won over young Asian voters or Muslim women.
Customers are pleased to have minute to minute access to any data resulting from the fulfillment program. View detailed reports on usage, product history and more. Keep informed on product quantity. Trust that your products are handled with care. Trackability that customers are obtaining orders promptly. Receive emails when inventory runs low or sits idle for too long.
--Evolution is bullshit.
Believe me buddy I was rooting for you.. I would sooo much rather be chilling in heaven right now because my laundry pile is HUGE..
It’s sad how we live in a world that just seems to zoom by, and we get so caught up with everything that’s going on– work, making money, greed, self-interest, education, wars, poverty, campaign, global warming, even the hunger games (ok, that was unnecessary)– that we really forget to stop and analyze what it is we have, and how we have and are slowly changing; the new factors that influence and play roles in our lives, new people that we meet, and even those that are now gone. To think back to years before– on this same day– and try to remember what you did, who you were, and even who you thought you were going to be. Have things played out the way you expected them to? Have you diverted from your path? have you lost sight of who you were or what you once dreamed of?
It was a beautiful day yesterday. A little windy, but beautiful. So I set up to work outside. That way the boys could play and I could craft and keep an eye out to make sure they didn't wander away.
A demain mes amis, thank you for reading me!
SRP: $40.99
I’ll often work through lunch, eating a sandwich at my work station. When I’m done, I’ll usually save the Zip-Lock bag I packed it in, unless it’s been stained by mayonnaise dripping out the side of my turkey sandwich. When this happens, I’d like to be able to throw it away without getting up. I don’t want to put it into recycling, because that would destroy the Earth.
The upstairs bathroom (which was the only bathroom) was in pretty good shape for being fully original. While we chose to redo the bathroom, we ended up going with a similar look and colour scheme.
Melson told congressional investigators that he and ATF’s senior leadership “moved to reassign every manager involved in Fast and Furious, from the deputy assistant director for field operations down to the group supervisor” after ATF whistleblowers went to the press and Capitol. But according to Melson, he and company were ordered by Justice Department higher-ups to remain silent about the reasons for the reassignments.
Arriving back home and turning on the TV I couldn't really take in what my eyes were actually seeing. It was so unbelievable! It was like something out of a movie but my brain knew this was so very real. For the first time, for me, the world had become a frightening place.
She didn’t speak, it was time for her to enjoy. The world was a horrible place for the inhabitants of the city she promised to protect, and in promising to protect it she opened herself up to a slew of horrendous sights, sights she would not wish in her enemy’s nightmares… But now was not the time to focus on those things as she indulged in pampering, feeding, touching only befitting a queen. Fed, but not stuffed her plate was removed and she lay on her back.
My writer’s journey is just beginning.
4. Add half the flour mixture to the bowl and beat gently. Add the sour cream to the bowl and beat again. Then add the last half of the flour mixture, beating only until just combined.
Personally, I am not going to lay out in the sun to bake and change my skin tone.
So with pen in hand I wrote the following into my calendar:
She was crying and of course I went out to see what was the matter.
Unfortunately for me, it was that creativity that paid off and left me face-to-face with the truth. I couldn’t hack the code on his phone (and by the way, if you find yourself ever in that position, just go ahead and walk away. You are officially in an unhealthy relationship). So, I finally pulled out the memory card and loaded it into my phone. It worked. I got to see all the many, many pictures in his phone of the girl he had all but left me for. It was quite an eyeful. I wasn’t crazy … yay? There I stood, with that phone in my hand, shaking and stunned. My relationship had felt doomed for a while, yes, but this was a whole new level of bad. This was IT, man. I had to face the fact that life as I knew it, and all the hopes and dreams I’d had for the future, it was all done.
Andrew Alameno, 37, Westfield, N.J.
In the end, I'm left with a main header pipe to match up with my RPM zone, that is stepped up and mated to a megaphone for looks. a simple hanger is attached to the front swingarm bolt. The entire thing will get coated in trusty bbq paint, and possibly wrapped in header wrap. A few photos are shown below.
Well, as the saying goes “every good thing must come to an end,” and this proves true for our lack of separation. Paul’s squadron is gearing up for a long deployment next year so we’re in the workup phase. Since May, Paul’s been home about nine weeks. I’m alone a lot these days. Well, besides my two adorable pups.
In a moment of exuberance over my near perfect form, I launched the bell a little too hard, missed the catch, and sent it scuttling across the floor and into a water bottle.
- Elizabeth Berkley as Tess
I only needed 1 yard and I managed to whip up 2 lumbar pillow covers in no time.
The set design is clever for its simplicity and usefulness; not a single prop nor even the backdrop goes to waste. This includes a floor covered in soil, making for an interesting clean-up activity for stage hands. The play itself doesn’t muck around, with a duration of around 45 minutes, bookended neatly by scenes shrouded in an eerie darkness. But Here, in the Sugarcane does leave the audience a little shrouded in confusion at a relatively indefinite ending, which can summarise the basic difficulty with this compact play.
“Aaaahhh… ssshaahh… so good…”
Something you don't see too often anymore...hairstylists wearing uniforms. You see it at beauty schools since they wear matching school smocks, but I would love to see a salon bring back the matching smocks. These smocks are from a 1959 salon magazine. If you know about a vintage salon that does this, please tell me about them!
Do you dream of loved ones that have made their way to the other side? It is fantastic to communicate with them again. To say things you may have forgotten to tell them while they were still here in physical form. To hold them close to your heart and feel their warmth is a blessing. To know that you can still have access to them brings you such JOY!
I needed to vent today. I know why my friends and family members have been talking. And I get it. I just don’t have to like it.
So- if you ever see a few Spanish words sneak into something I write – ya sabes porque.
Kunda Guruji says that the loukika response is a worldly wise.
Blaze the Cat
Last night Mr. Randolph and I took on a load of cooking. We have a system for Gumbo cooking. It is ALWAYS a team effort and mostly quite a pleasant time to spend with one another. He cuts all of the veggies (onions, bell peppers, celery, etc.), prepares the sausage and tasso, along with making sure the Tater Man stays clear of my roux (oil and flour) while it is cooking. I have never escaped a gumbo with out a few spattered burns and I would freak if Tater Man got caught in the crossfire.
AB 1014 reduces unnecessary restrictions on brewery tasting rooms.
To pull along the most merciful cat,/
Service matters! Friendliness and attentiveness go a long way.
And even then if you consider yourself poor, because we live in America, there is no reason that you can’t improve your situation. There are plenty of people on here who have been poor who now are considered rich. I’ve been poor, then middle class, then back to poor, and now Barack Obama says I’m rich. We don’t have a caste system. Nearly everyone can improve their situation through effort.
Their work has been more than a source of income;
He held me close
Toasted muesli bar with orange marmalade - A disappointing start as the muesli flake to moustache yield was quite low with only a solitary puffed speck of rice attaching after first bite. But still, the tangy aftertaste of the marmalade was quite pleasant.
Justin and I made it back from our childless adventure safe and sound. Just a disclaimer: nap time is almost over and didn't go well to begin with. So I cannot predict how well, or poorly, this post will turn out.
But what exactly should they be? Here are a few tips on how to help those who are scratching their heads.
Water in your brush and an image to paint!
Department: Japan Studies
Hi Everyone, today I have a new logo and business card to show you for my sister's chiropractic office.
You know yourself better than anyone Jillian Bea.
The interviews comes the same day as a new report says that Justice Department investigators may try to charge him with a hate crime, and they are thought to be using the alleged murmuring on the 911 call to argue he said a racial slur before fatally shooting the teen.
a sapling from the soil.
1989
Today I am talking to Catherine Bailey founder and managing director of Bar marketing Limited. With the changing legal landscape, the cuts in legal aid and competition from solicitor-advocates there can be no better time for barristers to market themselves within, of course, the rules of ethics prescribed by the Bar Council and Bar Standards Board.
A Sin Chew reporter, Malay Mail photographer and Channel News Asia video cameraman were all beaten up to pulp, and another journalist from Merdeka Review also claimed that she was assaulted by for four police personnel who attempted to seize her camera and mobile phone.
The "next day" she's taking to Brittany about how much she misses her social life and blah, blah, we hear this on every episode of 16&Pregnant. Then she drops the bombshell that if she could go back and have an abortion she would.
The windows to your soul
My image is "kisses" by the uber talented Mo Manning. You can find her here. I coloured her with Copics. and added stickles to the dots on her dress and her petticoats. Her necklace charm and shoes have been glazed.
One drop missing from the ocean tides.
Why the hell did I decide to install Windows XP on my six-year-old Gateway PC?
Something smells fishy - Challenge for Lasting Memories site.
“This is the most far-reaching CBA in the country," declares ACORN's Lewis, who is contractually obligated to support the project. Unmentioned is that experts like Bettina Damiani of Good Jobs New York have described how more legitimate CBAs bring together groups that would ordinarily oppose a project, rather than the groups that signed this CBA.
A successful apple and pear grower, he believes his community is living on borrowed time: “More white farmers have been killed than British soldiers in Afghanistan and Iraq. Yes, we are at war here.”
At a run, down the stairs we flew, and up the other side just in time to zip on to Northwest DC.
Have you been there? I have and guess what?
The group is called: OOPS! It stands for Onslow Outdoor Painters Society. Within the county that I currently reside, this group gathers for creative expression and supportive fellowship in the art of painting in plein air.
I woke up this morning not sure what day it was...very disconcerting- is it Tuesday? No...WAIT...it's WEDNESDAY! YAY. That means one less day till Christmas. Can you feel excitement in the air?
Monica Sone, author of Nisei Daughter, Betty MacDonald's friend, described as Kimi in The Plague and I, honour member of Betty MacDonald Fan Club and Betty MacDonald Society
- Colton has taken all feedings by mouth since Friday. The kid LOVES to eat!
Put the butter in your mixer.
Oh yeah – a salesperson who eliminates this weakness will sell about 20% more.
Hooray! It's Christmas! Let's take the dog out to shit in a twinkling forest haunted by a disproportionately small man with a bag of stolen goods, an oversized puppy wearing the fat man's hat and some randomly dispersed giant boxes!
Huggies
3/4 cup soft unsalted butter, cut into pieces
What is in store for today, well what is left of the day?
3 originally
8. Doctor 6
It is reflection of human behavior and violence and how kids deal with it.
Other: cardstock: white; stamps (birdcage, sentiment): The Craft's Meow (Fly Free); ink: Versafine (Onyx Black), Memento (London Fog), Distress Ink (Iced Spruce); Spellbinders™ dies: S5-031 Fancy Tags Three, S5-051 Fanciful Flight; brads; lace trim
I've heard people say that their kids outgrew the lesson packets, but I'm a firm believer that these lessons can be used well into the teen years. Now that we have a wide range of ages (5-15) we still use the lesson visuals and outlines as a starting point and often finish with a whole new focus. I've used parts of lessons for primary lessons, sharing times, and even YW lessons. Visual aids, object lessons, and real life applications never go out of style. I plan on keeping mine for many years and passing them on to my own kids someday. :)
That I should seem to lack humanity
He had cleaned the entire apartment. *I may have said, don’t worry about getting me a birthday present, please just clean your room* So he showed me what he had been up to all day…Cooper even got me a birthday card.
All I know is that I will cradle myself
And all this is against a backdrop of radio broadcasts that fill us with rage and despair.
He pushed me once, knocked me to the floor, when I was pregnant with our first child. I remember telling him then and there that if anything like that ever happened again we were through; I would divorce him. There were times when I regretted that threat. I believe if I hadn't made it he would have hit me. And I could have left. I could have escaped. And people would understand.
One of the reasons we're in a hurry to be done with school is that we only have three weeks left before we start Vacation Bible School. With all the decorating and planning and details that have to be cared for, we have no time left for such mundane things as getting an education! Our theme this year is Adventure on the High Seas, and among other things, I'm trying to put together pirate costumes for all of our boys. Nicky (I think they voted to make him the challenging child for this summer) told me he doesn't need a costume because he's already put together his own. I've tried to gently point out the fact that, not only does it not look even remotely like a pirate's costume, but it also features a vest that is at least two sizes too small. Alas, the child is stubborn, and I'm not sure I can convince him to give up his idea.
Finally, apps and ebooks may or may not have an impact- but I have no experience of them, so I can't comment from experience. Nosy Crow's Cinderella app looks great, and I am quite excited about the possibilities of the Choose Your Own Adventure app- the original books were huge favourites with Y3 and 4 boys. In my experience this is the age that children may start to be reluctant to read independently, but spotting the furtive groups of boys huddling in the corners of playground swapping books was a delight in the 90s!
And yes , I do only point out that they are missing on the Champions League because under Benitez the unhappy fans at the club were ruffled by the success in Europe but lack of it in a title race – now they have neither.
I also really loved the emphasis on integration. There are some psychologists who want nothing to do with spirituality and many Christians who think psychology is dubious at best and evil at worst. Personally, I don’t agree with either of those extremes and found that my approach to the field was well supported in this program. We constantly explored and reevaluated our own personal beliefs toward the end of combining the best of Christian Theology and the best of Psychology into a coherent sustainable therapeutic approach. I feel like the result is that I am now equipped to work with any and every people group.
“Good afternoon, welcome to Virgin Atlantic, may I see your ticket?” Reality. Why does she need to see my ticket? I bet she thinks I couldn’t possibly be sitting in Upperclass. Well, I am Missy.
and Light Creme.
Glue on the post earrings. Allow the glue to set overnight or according to the glue manufacturer's instructions.
I was getting ready to don my favorite shirt, when I took a good, long look at it. I have had this particular white terry-cloth pullover for years. I'm going to say at least 15. I realized that it has changed quite a bit from the day I first bought it. It has evolved from just a casual pullover that I could bleach when it got dirty, to, well, shabby-chic. Then I thought, isn't that just like us growing older? Honestly, I could not be called "chic". I could, however, be called shabby on weekends. But who in their right mind dons clean, ironed, stain-free clothes to muck out a barn? (And don't say Martha Stewart, because she doesn't muck anything! She has minions for that.) And who wants to change their clothes three/four times a day? That means more laundry, which means more water used, more electricity used, laundry detergent, time, etc. And we are all too frugal for that, aren't we??
Is there any God besides me? No, there is no other Rock; I know not one.” Isaiah 44:8
Of course, hon - what color would you like?
Cut Tempting Turquoise Cardstock 4.25 X 11". Score at 1.5 and 5.5". Use Corner Rounder to round top corners. Cut two pieces of BuildaBear Workshop Pawsitively Prints II DSP: 1.25 X 4" for the flap and 3 X 4" for under the flap and attach to card. Stamp Buggy from Baby Bundle stamp set in Basic Black on Whisper White cardstock and then stamp the baby's head in the carriage also in Basic Black. Color with Blush Blossom, Tempting Turquoise, Poppy Parade and Pear Pizzazz Markers as desired. Punch with 2.5" Circle punch. Cut 3" circle using Big Shot Die and use Perfect Polka Dot Embossing Folder to add texture. Attach two circles together and attach to card front with Stampin' Dimensionals. Tie Pear Pizzazz Seam Binding around card to close. For inside of card: round top corners of Poppy Parade(4 X 5.25") and Whisper White Cardstock
No really I can. I truly believe one of the reasons I have never been taken hostage is because terrorist take one look at me and say “No Fred, don’t take her. She will kill us with her words. Too many words.” Then like Dick Van Patton in High Anxiety they would be found dead on the ground with blood oozing from their orifices. I digress.
I arrived back at the airport a bit before 10 a.m. Got my bags and caught the free shuttle bus to Bewley’s. I checked in, dropped my bags in my room and popped down to the lobby for a bite to each, a few pints and a good old run at the free wi-fi that Bewley’s provide (and *why* don’t *more* hotels and facilities provide free wi-fi. I mean, in this day and age…).
Move to Move
(And one addition to this, after I originally posted it: I don't generally hold with the precious snob talk about how you must drink your whiskey neat...but in the case of Irish? Since most of it is 80 proof, it's great neat, and that's how most folks do drink it. If you want a hot whiskey, and the place you're in will do one, and it's cold and raw like it is today here in Philly, do it!)
This is a normal part of Ayahuasca work, and I had been surprised that during the first session I did not vomit at all. Everyone else certainly did, throughout that and the other nights, and that was expected. Tonight, I did – just this once, and it was very clean and good and long. It felt so very clarifying and it made me more comfortable for the rest of the long session. It was the first time I had ever purged like that as a healthy and cleansing process and not as a bodily reaction to being ill. It felt wonderful.
"It's opened my mind" He said one Saturday while we were watching the match. "For instance, their number nine there, he's got fantastic thighs hasn't he, and for a big man, he's really graceful."
They are there, cheering you on, pushing you harder, walking with you when you need it, sometimes even carrying you.
THE SIX NEEDS ARE:
There is also an article at Physics World including quotes from yours truly. You will note I have been nice about everybody. Except NASA of course.
Our two travel days through Honduras and Guatemala into Belize consisted of early mornings and long bus rides, but went rather smoothly. After crossing into Belize we were able to experience some of the countryside. The highway takes you through small towns with homes on stilts and multiple palm trees. Always funny how many speed bumps appear out of nowhere on these traveled roads. Belize appeared more flat than the rest of Central America. Nothing larger than a hill was visible in any direction. The shuttle dropped us off in Belize City along the Caribbean Ocean which led us to our Water Taxi out to the island of Caye Caulker. The boat was a smooth 45 minute ride over glassy turquoise waters.
You bought an older home ten years ago. You’ve spent your weekends restoring it to pristine condition. Everyone comments on how gorgeous it looks. Suddenly, the worst case scenario becomes your reality. A kitchen fire goes out-of-control and ravages your home – destroying 40% of the living space.
Have you had a go at this months Tag Swap theme? Nip on over to the shop blog
I look forward to seeing you there.
Ever since my Belgian exchange student days, I've loved apple and custard confections, and something really struck me in Dorie's recollection of her first attempt at making the tart. "This tart was a revelation...it seemed remarkable, if not downright unbelievable that I, a beginning baker...could make something with flavor and texture authentic enough to transport me to the world capital of pastry. It was the encouragement I needed to keep baking." (Emphasis mine.)
In a month, or a little more, it'll have passed. We'll have all settled into the rhythms of the warm season. The burnout, the temperamental moments will have been all but forgotten. Metaphoric waters on proverbial bridges. That is, until next year, when once more our collective mettle is tested by the cruelty of April.
Magnus Fin and the Ocean Quest
Her boastful Saxon ways,
It's computer time here. Or should I say lack thereof? We started a snowball with one car accident with one of our daughters. The next day, my husband and another daughter, were in my car when they had a fight with a falling tree... and didn't win the argument.
I recommend this for any doggie, My mom found this at a special store at Westpark mall in Strongsville, Ohio. It came from the same store that my daddy got me the big cookie shaped like a bone and the dog brick puzzle game. The links will take you to my YouTube videos of demonstrating both these items. Woof! Woof!
My goal for you... find something about your husband that is TOTALLY HIS... electrical work... type of music... love for landscape... favorite sports team... whatever it is, you probably already know... and you already love/support/endure his love... so LOVE IT RIGHT BACK... and you will have a great night... :-)
All purpose flour-1.5 cup
You will need to run.
Track 9 - Funkgasm ( Seka's Fantasies )
Overall, given that this was literally the very first meal they served to paying customers, I thought they did a fine job. I'm looking forward to going back and trying some of their other sandwich offerings and the Oysters Rockefeller, which I hear are superb.
2) Audio Drama – Adaptation of Best-selling novel, being done as online radio drama.
The Fleer Flair box holds 20 packs plus a box topper. After opening these three packs, we will only have seven remaining Flair packs (the box topper was opened earlier this morning in case you missed it)!
- Oh dear. What seems to be the problem, Ju-Ju?
Zimbabwean Justice Minister Patrick Chinamasa dismissed the High Court’s move as “null and void”, calling the attempts to attach assets nothing more than “political grandstanding” and the properties were under diplomatic immunity.
Since 10pm the night before.
Do you know who or what Snopes is? Snopes is about as reliable as Wikipedia. It’s a husband and wife team running a website out of California. To suggest that they have any better information about the cost of this junket than the writers if the Indian Press Trust is risible.
O
Scott who now goes under the assumed name of Lee, told Closer magazine that Golding, from Braunston, near Daventry, was apologetic and promised he would look after her.
Of course, as we all know the “jobs white folk won't do” claim is another of the huge lies like “the economic benefits of immigration” and “only white people can be racist” which the promoters of multiculturalism have managed to insert into our folklore.
Given the current environs—as I watch my right to an abortion slowly erode—I find it hard to believe any imminent totalitarian government would be focused on sexual liberty, but there are still parts of Brave New World that do seem rather prescient. In the age of Facebook and Twitter, Huxley’s notion of togetherness, and the demonization of individuality, are particularly poignant. Death, in his novel, is to be accepted without fanfare; after all, “the social body remains, even if the component cells may change.” A society where the community is more important than individual members? Where those who spend time alone are considered odd? Huxley surely couldn’t have anticipated computers, let alone social networking, but he ends up not too far off the mark.
► conducive to conversation
We have been talking in the last few post about God Encounters (If you have not read them I encourage you to click back and check them out) and today I really want you to get the point of it all.
2. Peppermint (taffy, schnapps, or cane form)
I think the pink one will stay as it is. The black and yellow one will be redone after I find something that I like better to go between the yellow beads and the round black ones. The small and medium crystals that are filling in currently to make the bracelet long enough to wear are black but just not "doing it" for me. I'll figure something out on my next trip to the bead store.
Despite a gloomy global outlook due to the dire situation in Europe, the Government forecasts the economy to grow at a healthy 3.25 per cent next year and stay at trend or above afterwards.
4 Williams, Serena
“Yeah… That about covers it… But Paul Distracted the third” Jonan replies.
“We note the statement today issued by Ticketus and its withdrawal as a potential partner for the Blue Knights.
I'm not posting the recipes from class but they don't have special powers or ingredients...the class is more about technique. We spent a lot of time feeling different dough textures to determine the difference between dry, middle, and wet doughs. We kneaded our dough and brought it up for the instructor to feel it!
The state had previously said it would not ask for the death sentence for Anthony.
Once the mixture is very cold, pour into ice cream maker, and process until thick and creamy.
You’ll have to build your house once more.
and as he passed the pretzel stand,
The U.N. vote comes at a time when Israelis are feeling increasingly besieged. In the last year, Israel's closest regional ally, Turkey, has turned outright hostile; Turkey's Islamist prime minister, Recep Tayyip Erdogan, last week threatened to dispatch warships against Israel. The peace with Egypt is unraveling: Two weeks ago, as a mob ransacked Israel's embassy in Cairo, Egyptian leaders refused to take desperate calls from their Israeli counterparts and dispatched commandos to rescue Israeli personnel only after American intervention. Israel evacuated its embassy in Amman, Jordan, over the weekend to avert a similar situation.
ME: A humidifier?
“Where did you come from?” Seth asked, keeping his voice low.
No, the romance and the beauty were all gone from the river. All the value any feature of it had for me now was the amount of usefulness it could furnish toward compassing the safe piloting of a steamboat. Since those days, I have pitied doctors from my heart. What does the lovely flush in a beauty’s cheek mean to a doctor but a ‘break’ that ripples above some deadly disease. Are not all her visible charms sown thick with what are to him the signs and symbols of hidden decay? Does he ever see her beauty at all, or doesn’t he simply view her professionally, and comment upon her unwholesome condition all to himself? And doesn’t he sometimes wonder whether he has gained most or lost most by learning his trade? (From Life on the Mississippi, Chapter 9; from the University of Virginia Library, Electronic Text Center)
I am counting down!!! Monday starts week 14 of 16, and that last week ends on Wednesday! After that, I'll be free until the last two weeks of August.
hope you enjoyed the randomness that is our life
...Above shows the back with Spellbinders Fancy Tags 3 die. Below shows the side (middle section) with eyelet where the seam binding has been tied through to make handle. I've added some beads at ends & knotted to secure. Also cute little Cuttlebug tag with eyelet tied on with hemp...
It's a big day for our dearest Nicole. The dresses are altered, the suits are tailored, and the bride and groom are counting down the hours. The wedding happens tomorrow morning and we're so thrilled, we can't stand it!!!
Association, the recovery
I live in Ontario, and come November it's getting very cold and all boats had been hauled out long before this. I was running out of time for the travel lift to be used to haul my boat and this was a pressing concern as time dragged on with this deal. The buyer kept assuring me the cheque would soon be coming, but I had to go ahead and incur further expense to haul the boat, have it blocked (put on stands) and have it winterized so things didn't freeze. My buyer agreed to pay the costs for hauling.
of hands that exfoliated the heated spaces
inside the petal’d crown
Two readers have sent in pictures from or about the Cornell Hawkcam, where you should be watching the red-tailed hawks and their offspring. Readers have noticed a second chick pecking its way out of the egg.
A rather weird week for me, here at Bell Creek Quilts. My motivation was lacking. :( I did buy some flannel but I made 4 pillowcases~so it was in and out~doesn't change my numbers. I also brought more blue (like in my latest MTAW), here. I figured with the blue left over and another half yard~I should be able to make another MTAW, but then, I think I will need to add a bit of the grey and black, too. :)
Spring Bedroom Linens Breakdown:
Well we were visited by the plague this weekend. Not fun.
The report isn’t swaying Grimm and Martin to change acreage intentions, as they expect their corn and soybean acreage mix to remain the same. The past couple days’ weather has kicked things into high gear on the Grimm farm. After a wet fall and snowy winter, the 70-degree days are just what the Midwest and South needed. Grimm said fall fieldwork has been pushed back to this spring.
R2-3- sc in each (6)
I usually work out in the evening, so when I get home and am hungry, I'll have bacon and eggs. Sometimes, for breakfast, I'll eat oatmeal with skim milk, raisins, cinnamon, and sliced almonds, then drink the protein shake later in the day.
Do you want to know what I love about sunglasses?
But cruel is she!
I think that was one thing that most impressed me about the movie -- the "group" of male friends that was portrayed. Why are so many men afraid to have real friends? Why do they fear conversation? And why do they shy away from revealing anything about themselves? Why do they find it "weak" to let people know the real person? What is it they are trying to hide? Why do they not want anyone to know they are "human"?
And fat. Who the hell opened my mouth and forced all that pie down it for a week? Oh, yes, it was my mother. (And those of you who think I'm joking have not met my mother.)
As we all know, what happens in the US affects all of us, one way or another.
Living as a thin chick in a fat chick’s world must be a nice thing. Firstly when you order a heap of food nobody gives you “the look” that says you pig! When you go to Dunne’s Stores the only sizes left are 6,8 and 10. Unless you are in Dunne’s Stores when they are physically stocking the new arrivals you can be guaranteed that the larger sizes sell out quicker. The same with Penney’s. You have to be quick to get the larger sizes. So as a thin chick you get the pick of the clothes! Bliss!
We're having road construction on the Highway by our house so we've got lots of things to watch. My kids are in heaven! As soon as the workers showed up my kids were out on the porch watching. Fionna even had to get out there. I guess I should be glad she at least put her boots on.
Maggie then meets a mysterious customer named Gil, who promises to help her with her blackouts if she talks to him about her mother, for a book he’s writing. Gil’s significance becomes clearer later on when we find out who he is, but even from the beginning, he offers Maggie hope that her life may return to normal. To be honest, Gil creeped me out. I couldn’t understand why Maggie trusted him so easily, and I understood even less why she was sexually attracted to him. A quick re-reading of his first appearance reminded me he was a youngish, attractive man, yet for some reason (maybe his name? his Master Caine-type promise?) I kept imagining him as an elderly grandfather figure. Even without the age factor, however, he’s definitely creepy, showing up at random moments and demanding to know more about Maggie’s mother. That being said, his obsessive tendencies are explained, and we do see his significance.
By the way, I have Photoshop Elements and Lightbox, but I found Picnik so easy to use and the web-based aspect was so handy when working in a coffeeshop. Perhaps I'll head to these programs... Sigh.
Rick turned 50 in 2012 and Dick will be 72. As they speak and travel more they are racing less. At the beginning of their career, they participated in 50 races per year but now aim for 20-25 races per year. They still say they don’t see an end in sight yet.
1.You have the phone on vibrate and when some one rings you the phone vibrates off the table into a glass of water. Someone told me that they met someone that this happened too.
Also, a CM education changes dramatically over your child's life. In other words, what it looks like in preschool is very different from what it looks like in high school, and there are a couple of shifts in between as well.
A visit to brother/sisterinlaw who live in a Warwickshire village.
He now appears to believe that he can make his way out of his hole by digging deeper.
IMPORTANT: If you want people to be able to find more of your work if they’re interested, let me know when you send in your submission if you have a website, blog, Twitter account, or any site that you want to be included in the zine (example: Urban Foraging by Cindy Jones (www.foragingwithcindy.com).
Here are some more experiments to try:
- Rimmel eye/ lip: CAD4.99
Now I’m not Catholic, and I’ve had more than a few friends in my time that would not have appreciated such a gesture, particularly from a stranger, but personally I was grateful for the sentiment. The way I figure it, the more mobility and independence you get, the more I figure I need all the help I can get.
2. Revolutions Per Minute
I stayed up way too late the night before putting finishing touches on the kids' Valentine's Day gifts! Using Photoshop, I created individual pieces of artwork for each child (modified from this Pinterest link), listing some of the things we love most about them right now, and capping it off with a life verse that seemed best for each of them.
The victim is David Lock, a relatively young Wall Street type, murdered in the parking garage of his work. At first the hour of his death seemed suspicious, but his boss assured Beckett that since he worked with their Asian clients overseas and therefore needed to match their time zones, it wasn’t at all unusual. What is suspicious is that a coworker who recently got passed up for a promotion that David was granted never showed up for work. Castle and Beckett head over to his apartment and find the door barricaded. The man – Charlie – has chained himself to the wall and implores Beckett to shoot him because he saw what attacked David and was attacked himself. Just like David, he has bite marks in his flesh.
During the second half of the nineteenth century, any a editor or journalist worth his salt would expect to spend some of his professional life in prison.
- Organic Grass Fed meat
It is interesting that sometimes you can save not only by consolidating, but also by just repacking:
Time and Nature.
In the mean time I'm gonna have to build my courage to keep enduring the current insanity of this global dominant fucktardish so-called society...
6. Turkey
Government-Sponsored Monopolies
That all everyone! look them up and enjoy them!
07-30 Cleveland, OH – Jacobs Pavilion At Nautica
Lemon juice – 1 tablespoon or more
what’s some advice you can give other women looking to start or develop their own business? Believe in yourself and try it. You don’t want to get to have to live with the “if only/what if”. It’s a much better feeling to say “I tried and look at what I did!!”
The focus of the song was God and His character. They wanted to praise Him for who He is. As Christian’s we know ‘who He is’ in teh most remarkable way because He has revealed Himself through the person of Jesus. The One who Created, Sustains, Saves and Reigns. The One full of compassion, justice and mercy.
Saturday 21st April 2012
And while I'm not a religious guy, I know every prayer counts when you're facing something as big as cancer, or a child with cancer.
the priests who gave me your Body and Blood in Holy Communion;
My diet has become markedly different over the last decade alone, especially in the produce department. Man-oh-MAN, I did not like vegetables as a kid. But once I hit 20, they magically became somewhat appetizing. Except for spaghetti squash. That took a few more years, and here’s why...
Think: How would you describe your current family? Your family of origin? Your extended family?
2. Tomorrow we are looking at seven houses. Maybe we'll like one or two of them.
*Also, while many people only know the patriarchal version of the myth of Persephone and Demeter, there is another version that is shared in Lost Goddesses of Early Greece by Charlene Spretnak that I had read well over a decade ago. That 'pre-hellenic' version of the myth is the one that emerged while I was writing the above.
Soraya would go to the man’s house to clean for him and cook. She then became friends with this man and his son because they treated her with respect. Her husband would follow her and watch everything she did. On two occasions he saw her talking to the man she worked for in what ‘appeared’ to be private and intimate conversations. From these two incidences he accused her of having the intention to cheat on him which is considered to be adultery in itself.
1 protruded
If you’re thinking or wondering about my dating life, I ask that you pray that I have a love like that to call mine.
Young pros details all of the youngsters from outside the first-team squad who have signed professional contracts, including those currently out on loan. This is the place to read about players on the cusp of the squad, such as Jay Emmanuel-Thomas and Henri Lansbury, as well as exciting foreign talents like Ryo Miyaichi and Samuel Galindo.
McCrum is clearly a fan of Wodehouse’s, and throughout this book is the great writer’s ardent defender (where defense was found needed). But McCrum’s affection does not blind him, and however little he may think Wodehouse is to blame, the biographer is faithfully frank about his subject’s failings. His prose is lucid and bright, and best of all compelling. This last is true in more ways than one.
Elon’s defense is holding opponents to a 24% rate on third down conversions, one reason why the Phoenix have a five-minute per game time of possession advantage.
2. Isn't this actually measure having equivalent effect as statutory license?
But my goal was just to make her think about it,
Carrie Fundingsland – It’s funny that you ask. Just last night I was running through my head all the things that I miss doing - hobbies I did before running my own business and raising a family. I am really interested in fashion design, nothing to mass market, just unique pieces I can wear myself. I also miss painting. I’ve barely picked up a brush since I left art school. I’d love to find the time to take some fine arts classes, perhaps in oils or charcoal.
“We priced the car at the top of the price range you would find for a used 2010 Mini Cooper on AutoTrader.com because of the special and unique nature of the vehicle,” said John Fagan, VP Director of Marketing at Penguin Books. “We’ll consider all offers, but are obviously looking to get as much for the vehicle as possible as all the proceeds benefit the New York Public Library, one of New York City’s most treasured institutions.”
Jim Pugh: trombone
I’ve been working on my own outlook for years. I am a tremendous fan of many of the tenets of AA — especially “act as if” and “fake it till you make it” — despite not having any addictions myself. I figured out long ago that you don’t have to feel something deeply to act as if you do; often, the feeling will follow. For instance, in medical school, I started out being too reserved, and then learned to act as if I were outgoing. Eventually, I started to enjoy the sound of my own voice, and there was no looking back. I advise my own students to appear interested and happy, and they may become so; even if they don’t, they’ll get higher marks. As an intern, I noticed that my favorite residents were the ones who appeared serene no matter what kind of insanity was going down. I resolved to be this way myself, and I became famed for being unflappable and cheerful. (I admit I am by nature relatively unflappable, but when you have 12 admissions to your team and they’re bleeding out or seizing or screaming about the bad food or scoring crack in the cafeteria and then developing chest pain, the temptation to freak out is great.)
Figure 4: German Foodservice Technology Trends – Marcellino’s Restaurant and Hotel Report Lite Application
'NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!'
Many thanks to Tamsyn for the interview!
So, what's the scuttlebutt? What have you been up to?
Ugh I feel horrible. My goal was to post once a week and I've failed! I swear I thought I had until tonight. Oh well....I'm posting now.
Black beans with brown rice
This week, I balance between writing and research, at times buoyed by Wesley Dean Smith's comments that if you can't find the answer to your research question within three clicks on Google, your readers won't give a damn. But my heroine is a teacher in 1842, Hobart Town, Tasmania. And let me tell you, I couldn't find info within three clicks. In fact the search was so convoluted that I don't think I could even reconstruct it.
This one is for emotional reunions. At a fair distance from your beloved, shout their name, open your arms and a look on you face that says I’ve longed for this moment and run towards your partner. You may have seen this in films where it usually plays out in slow motion. Videojug suggest you try and slow it down too. At a normal speed this isn’t a hug, it’s a rugby tackle, or a wresling move or a total mix.
Stacked was surprisingly busy for a Tuesday afternoon, with about 3/4 of the tables filled with customers. Probably because I was alone, I was seated at a tiny table tucked a corner, even though there were lovely empty booths available nearby.
Restaurant-Genghis Grill
I will however ponder this: If a black man was running for a public office using gun imagery and speaking using "black dialect" aka "ebonics" while calling people dummy, do you think he would be seen as patriotic and a viable, realistic candidate for any political position? Or would he be labeled a thug who lacks class and is too lowly to hold any position of power? Why is it that when it comes to certain stereotypes, some are ok, while others are not?
Mix 1/4 cup soy milk with tapioca flour, stir until blended and set aside. Combine remaining soy milk and sugar saucepan and bring to a boil. Remove from heat, add tapioca mixture and vanilla essence. Place in fridge to cool completely- it takes a few hours.
this person will say or do something to bring the relationship to an end.
I guess this would be Powell's novel length debut although he had a rather beautifully produced novella called Silversands come out last year that reminded me a lot of Gateway. I'm eager to see how his writing matures to a longer length.
Phoebe Finds Her Voice ~ a tall tales & short stories review
6) Working with the Scottish Government, we will deliver 5000 new council houses across the lifetime of this parliament, and will continue to make resourcing housebuilding and refurbishment a priority in setting their budgets – helping employment and improving quality of life.
Since Rocks brewing co. moved in and the rave reviews from beery folks here in Aussieland it has always been one of the pubs I have wanted to visit most! So wondered in at around 6.30pm on a Tuesday evening to see what all the fuss was about.
The better news? I bought Black Heart by Holly Black and Slice of Cherry by Dia Reeves yesterday, and if that doesn't get me out of my reading slump, then I don't know what will. I also bought a new charger for my Nook, which means I can finally get around to reading my NetGalley copies of Transcendence by C.J. Omolulu, The Peculiars by Maureen Doyle McQuerry, Jersey Angel by Beth Ann Bauman, and A Greyhound of a Girl by Roddy Doyle. What can I say? Yesterday was a very good day.
“…. is looking for leaders who will be resourceful, adaptable, resilient, self-motivated and prepared to work in remote and challenging environments, away from e-mail and sometimes any form of social life, for extended periods..... This endeavour is not for the faint-hearted; but we believe that the right person will find considerable job satisfaction.”
There are tons of reasons why it’s a good idea to make greetings cards rather than buy them.
I rise with my red hair
I read this morning that while these organic colorings work wonderfully for baking and even icing, that the colors are not typically as vibrant as the artificial counterparts and produce more of a pastel-like hue.
Get Bible verses as well as Christian quotes, sayings and quotations delivered right to your inbox here…
Sprawl, deSchmog, Bayou Pigs, Cinco Dudes, Sad Pygmy, Fleshmop, Grindin’ Teeth, Anarchitex and the Cave Reverend are just a few of the bands resurrecting themselves. I feel way worse missing this than I did missing my 20-year high school reunion earlier this year. After all, the Axiom is where I cut more than a few of my punk rock teeth as both a fan and a performer.
Goo is led away in handcuffs and leg chains. His head bowed low he mutters profanities to the jurors.
"I ask all fellow Girl Scouts who want a true, all-girl experience not to sell any Girl Scouts cookies until GSUSA (Girl Scouts of the USA) addresses our concerns," says the girl, identified as a teen named Taylor, a troop member from California, in some news reports. "I ask all parents who want their girls to be in a safe environment to tell their leaders why you will not allow your girls to make any more money for GSUSA."
Actually, an awful lot of digging and planting. My allotment is 270 square yards, which is a massive space for one person to work on. So far, I have planted Charlotte and Isle of Jura potatoes (enough to feed the whole street), mangetout, beetroot, swedes, brussel sprouts, parsnips, radish, all kinds of lettuce and leaves, spinach, pak choi, onions, garlic, shallots, carrots, aubergines, courgettes, squash, cabbage, tomatoes, leeks, marigolds, sunflowers, dahlias, sweetcorn, beans. I can't remember what else. That's quite a list, so it will do for now.
My second observation is that the Doctor’s 1966 appeal was rejected by Stott and other leaders, including EA officers, because they disagreed with its message. To blame Lloyd-Jones, and him alone, is to fly in the face of the facts. Again, I quote Alan Gibson who was present on the occasion and who attempted to submit a motion the following morning proposing discussion of the practical implications arising from the first meeting. “To our huge disappointment”, Gibson writes, “the organising committee had decided that no such motions would be accepted. Responsibility for closing down any real consideration of steps towards evangelical church unity does not belong to John Stott alone. It lies also with the 1966 officers of the Evangelical Alliance who changed the advertised programme and denied the Assembly, set up for that very purpose, any opportunity for practical consideration of the issues the Doctor had raised”.44
I know that it’s very popular and that it’s a quick way of getting a text blast out, so to speak, but an awful lot of it seems to be … just stuff that fills air.
Detzner has more than 30 years of management experience in the private sector and state government. He previously served as Chief of Staff for Secretary of State Jim Smith from 2002 to 2003 and was temporarily appointed to serve as Secretary of State by former Gov. Jeb Bush in 2003. He worked for 13 years as executive director of the Florida Beer Wholesalers Association and for six years as director of legislative and policy affairs for the Attorney General’s Office.
What an amazing collection of works by Picasso, Rodin, Jackson Pollock, Roy Lichtenstein, Rothko, and Giacometti sculptures.
The last couple of years have also taken me on a financial and emotional roller coaster of instability. But, I hang on because I love what I do.
The Secret Garden – Burnett
Your word this month - Groove
The irreducibly complex system in the ear is something that evolutionists can never satisfactorily explain. When we look at the theories evolutionists occasionally propose, we are met by a facile and superficial logic. For example, the writer Veysel Atayman, who translated the book Im Anfang War der Wasserstoff (In the Beginning was Hydrogen), by the German biologist Hoimar von Ditfurth, into Turkish, and who has come to be regarded as an “evolution expert” by the Turkish media, sums up his “scientific” theory on the origin of the ear and the evidence for it in this way:
When you've decided that you're happy with the size and the tightness of the knot, remove your fingers and just arrange the loops. You're then ready to add the bow to your project !
"Wooly Bully" by Sam the Sham & the Pharaohs
Sherman truly was ruthless in his Civil War march through Georgia and South Carolina. This biography examines possible reasons for the general’s behavior, finding likely clues in his childhood, his education and his secular jobs.
It seems car buyers believe Crossovers, SUVs and 4x4s are suited to their lifestyle and are now a consideration as they become financially viable. The Nissan Qashqai’s amazing success is a good example.
Aluminium Free Baking Powder – 1 Tsp
Once the jungle catches fire, even the wet burns away with the dry.
When last we left our hero, the phone was out. This morning, it was working again. With that problem dutifully resolved by ignoring it, it was time to do the laundry.
JORDAN: I went to school for fiber arts and began making strange trophy creatures as a part of my BFA thesis project that was inspired by a fascination in Cryptozoology (the study of hidden animals… like Bigfoot or the Loch Ness Monster) and sideshow gaffs. They were a little more grotesque in appearance when I began, but in time evolved into more colorful and sweeter versions, partly as an influence from working in the toy industry. I’ve turned them into a line of one of a kind soft sculptures called “Horrible Adorables” and sell them at indie craft fairs along the East coast!
::: The new Steve Miller Band here includes 3 ex-members of Frumious Bandersnatch..... Incredible, joyful, transcendent jamming in a number of places.
But with the clock ticking toward 2017, more needs to happen rapidly: Building or altering thousands of markets, and creating other food access initiatives such as farmers markets, needs an aggressive push, and focused leadership at the local level. To that end, eight Mayors from across the US were invited to the summit, to meet with Kass and other Administration officials.
Are books great gifts as presents?
Occupation: Doesn’t really have one
Add gelatin to cold water in a small saucepan and bring to boil until the gelatin is dissolved. This will help stabilize the whip cream so it can be piped onto the cheesecake; however, this step can be left out.
It might crawl to the floor; we must take care
~How can you give them a sense of purpose….
4. Lost - die hard
"Oh, have I just made an offence here in France?" I asked worriedly.
#7 Paul Hickey of Bespoke Investment Group: "More and more, we are hearing anecdotal comments from individual and professionals that this is the most difficult environment they have ever experienced as the market is like a fish flopping around after being taken out of the water."
First of all I need to address something that I've never really touched on before. I did a few times (?) in passing, but I don't think I've ever stated a disclaimer. Sadly, I believe it is time for one. So...here goes...it has been brought to my attention that some of the people I see on a regular basis are reading my blog and Tweets. While it's a free country and the Internet is for everyone, even those that should stay FAR away from the World Wide Web, this space here is MINE. If you know me in real life and I did not give you the URL to my blog, you may not question me on what you read here. I use this space for support from my Bloggy Gals and to give support. I also use this place to get things out of my head so I don't take anything I say personally. I won't bash you, but I might mention you as it pertains to me and my life. If you don't like what you read, you may click that cute little red 'X' over there in the corner.
This weekend, Mighty Mo is embarking phase two of his newest job. He heads out Sunday morning, and we won't see him again till Friday. (Unless you count Skype.) This, of course, means a big change for all of us. He asked me before he took this job what I thought of him traveling 75%-80% of the time. The fact is, I have mixed feelings. Very mixed feelings.
Opened - Assemblage 23
Please note that due to the Easter holiday the University Centre Saturday dates do not follow the normal pattern.
Ash stopped, pillow raised to a second attack. Her lower lip trembled and her eyes filled with silver tears. A spasm of pain cut through Ronan’s heart as he watched his daughter.
Duration : 2h 41mn
The city scape on the top of this page was drawn on x-press blending cardstock. I'd never really worked on this paper until I went to the Copic class in Chicago. The ever talented Mandi gave me some. Now, I'll admit that the first couple of time I drew on it, I didn't like it. I normally work on Bristol vellum finish board. But I kept at it,because I know many other artists that use copics on this paper and get amazing results. I have to say, now I'm completely sold. I really like how the markers blend on this paper. (A word of warning, unlike Bristol board, this does bleed through, so it's only good for drawing on one side, but it works great for drawing and cutting out.)
200g pasta uncooked
Picton is the departure point for those taking the ferry to Wellington, North Island – New Zealand. In that case “Fare thee well”. A warm welcome to those just arriving in Picton. Bon jour! Hello!
If you're looking for sleepwears at an affordable price (though may not be the lowest priced yet still okay - to me), I'd still suggest this site as worth the visit because of its huge range of design selection and they got what I liked. Truth is, Fantasydreams do actually offer lesser price but pretty limited - that doesn't necessarily mean they don't have my taste. In fact, they do - I will someday purchase a few from them. :) But at the moment, it ain't what I have in mind. Of course, we are all concern about the size. However, in my case... I know it'll fit me and it's meant to be loose, anyway.
Anyway, back on track, the public love these programmes and they clearly generate a huge income but is it actually worth sending people into meltdown with pressure? For me it is not so much the fact that contestants are becoming famous and then losing it which is the problem. Artists in music and television suffer this fate all the time. For me the problem is the sudden transition. You get average Joe or average Jane standing in the queue with a number associated with them one moment then the next they are living the celebrity life. That has to mess people up; with most artists in the music profession the change is gradual, or at least more gradual than literal overnight changes in the public opinion towards you.
“Really GB!” he exclaimed. “I don’t see the point of this vulgar exhibition!”
I listened to this song nearly every time I sat down to write the first draft. It's raw, earthy, simplicity is the perfect song for Jael. Plus the lyric "I must be one of the devil's daughters".
cause Thy face
and I can't see at all
Step back. Think of what you actually need to tell us: Gina is getting threats. The FBI is worried enough to assign an agent. She's not too happy about having an agent in her home.
Okay, so, I was serious when I said I had to take this blog private. I always HATE IT when blogs go private. However, our family is out there, A LOT. Meaning, I am constantly promoting the store, we have news articles, I have facebook friends that are really just more "associates" because of our new business, and so, comes the death of the public blog. :( It is one of the reasons I've been kinda quiet over here. I mean, I put up a blog post, and I have made it so it automatically tweets to my facebook page. Yeah, I don't know how to make it stop. :( But regardless, a quick google search would bring up my friendly little blog, and far too many people have access to our name, and we live in a CRAZY WORLD YA'LL!
For the first thirty minutes of the drive home, Andy and I shouted at everything. We yelled at Circle Ks, buildings we didn't recognize, and confusing highways. We did not, however, yell at McDonalds, who has totally always been there for us in times of need. What up, McD. *chest pound*
* 3 Songs from Ricochet by The Nitty Gritty Dirt Band. Ricochet was The Dirt Band's second album back when they still were toying with the idea that they could be the West Coast version of The Jim Kweslin Jug Band. Most the songs on the album, however, were fairly uninteresting folk-rockish pop. But I still love the crazy words-crazy tunes of their jug-band stuff.
Grizzly Bear out on the Seward Highway.
But what if dad is often out of town, or deployed and on the other side of the world. Why should these little ones not be able to hear their daddy's voices in the womb. Now they can! Sound Beginnings offers a service called Sound Delivery.
It is so perfect for the challenge this week. I colored the image with prismacolor pencils and gamsol.
Other news
ENTER TO WIN Journals of the Big Mouth Bass
There is a faux friendship here
“Not there either.” Said Bernadette. Landing on a man with the seemingly sweet and natural disposition of a child propping his head up against the window; eyes closed, his face left little expression to gauge his pervert risk factor but you know what they say about beggars, choosers, and limited bus seating. 'That was that' so they say as Bernadette laced her arms through around Matilda's brittle limb then shuffling their way toward the empty seat beside the young man in the middle of the bus. The other passengers did their best to not show a rumble of impatience in Mattie's octogenarian-delay; make no eye contact, smile if you accidentally do then look away. Even the special needs gang looked overly unaware in an obvious way and annoyed at the same time but took special care not to stare. The gaze of the old turns you to into a prune after all and her moth ball touch may very well leave the permanent stain of Ben-Gay mixed with years as her frail hands gripped the back of each seat while shoulders dodged her fingers. Matilda propped her self up, bodies shifted to the right giving all of the space her ancient frame needed
I did not mind that it had a longer lash band since I do like using these when I attempt the gyaru dolly look. However, I do know some do not like trimming since they find it a waste - you can see that there is more volume at the outer end so it changes the look the lashes give you. It may bother some but it all depends on what overall look you are going for.
Student : No, sir.
But there may be energies in our environment that can do the same thing, and these energies, in the places where the ghost lights appear, may be concentrated for some reason. This is all stuff that we’re just speculating on, but it does seem like the lights and the energy pertaining to the lights has very definite effects on the mechanisms of perception.
* Clear board in garden - its totally over grown with weeds, no plants in it yet
5. Your pastor doesn’t know everything.
I noticed at the time that I had very little space left and tried throwing out a few old applications without it making much difference. But now, in looking for the missing document, I suddenly saw that the problem was not in the applications but in the apparently harmless documents and photographs.
Judge me all you want- we all know from my Spotify Incidents that I have no shame.
What do you want your generation to be known for?
Looking to victory,
I said in my Three Kings review the plot of a renegade military force secretly going AWOL into enemy territory to steal captured gold has been done better before. Well, here is where it was done better. Kelly’s Heroes hits every mark: directing, writing, acting, action, and comedy. There is nary a flaw to be found.
“It’s really hard to be in the cafeteria, on Arthur Avenue, or at Pugsley’s and not eat everything in sight,” she said.
My cat is angry. Why? Because we left him home while we all went away, which is why you didn't get a post earlier this week. It's really hard to post without internet access. Really hard.
i knew it was time.
It's a dark horror comedy--think Shawn of the Dead meets The Hangover--with a few glimmers of sexual politics. Thankfully, the filmmakers don't use this movie as a soapbox, and so while we may be given a few comments, we're never given full-on commentary. There are moments that could be viewed as misogynistic, but they are (slightly) tempered with moments that are anti-misogynistic, so nobody should get too upset about it. Besides, it's just a movie, for Pete's sake. Sit back and enjoy the ride. Or turn the thing off.
My next issues all revolved around storage: how to make books easily available and how to store those pesky headphones. For this, I turned to DonorsChoose. If you've never heard of DonorsChoose or haven't yet tried it, you are missing out! It's a website for teachers to post grant ideas. The public gets to choose grants and projects to fund. I've had a total of five grants funded through this wonderful site. Anywho...I turned to DonorsChoose and wrote a grant for a storage cart to house my book collection, organize headphones, and hold the CD player. I also looked for a hanging bag storage system to hang many of my audio books. Thankfully, both of these projects were funded last school year and I was able to better organize my listening center. Problem number two solved.
We all pay the price of the academic failure of our youngsters. Crime rates, unemployment, social service costs, prison stays all go up when kids don’t succeed in school. We pay dearly for that. Not only are taxes higher as a result, but human potential is lost.
The day we got you was one of the most exciting days of my life. Watching two white puppies compete for our love, you clearly won. From day one you were crazy and so full of life. You would chase Joel and I around the house for hours, jump through hula-hoops, and prance through the snow. You were and always will be our sweet and hyper Kippy dog.
Micah - Rapunzel when her hair is cut
There are regular buses arriving here. The best place to check time schedule and cost is the I-site. Use the YHA card to get discounts.
My mother, for one, has been a champion at suggesting these type of ideas that make my stomach turn.
So I’ve got my bare-bones plot and now it’s just a matter of figuring out how to manipulate my characters into doing something they might not normally. My MC won’t just run off with a girl he barely knows, not unless there’s a damn good reason to, so I’ve got to give him one, or the girl does. Which leads me to the girl. Is she as nice as she was in the first draft? Does she have the same morals? What’s in it for her? Maybe she’s a bit more manipulative than we’ve been led to believe.
But, we restrained ourselves from ordering bowls, even though they had my favorite flavor, Chocolate Azteca. We saved ourselves instead for a sweet treat that can only truly be found in the great state of Louisiana. Maybe sno-balls aren’t the only reason this is the happiest state in the union (or was before BP took a giant dump in our Gulf), but they are certainly a factor. There’s nothing else like a sno-ball on a hot day. Like the shrimp bar-b-que I described that had nothing to do with bar-b-que or grills, sno-balls are nothing like snowcones. The ice is shaved, fluffy like snow, then doused with inventive flavors of syrup and often topped with sweetened condensed milk or marshmallow creme. It’s just another thing about this place that’s so indescribably better than the imagination can grasp, that it all falls in the you-had-to-be-there category.
As my box originated from Tanya's box tutorial, I don't think it's right to offer my template here, but if you like to make your own picnic basket, you can visit Tanya's blog to purchase her tutorial & adjust it like I did.
The clinic opens at 8:00 for your daily (sometimes every second day) ultrasound and blood work. They tell you that appointments are on a first come first serve basis. They tell you if you want the first appointment, show up early! I have no idea why they do this, it is not like they don’t know who is coming in that day. I think it would be better if they just scheduled an appointment time for everyone. Instead you have a group of women showing up at 7:00 – 7:30 glaring at one another making sure no one buds in line. I found this to be a stressful way to start my day.
Anvil is so compelling as a subject that the form and directing of the doc is almost immaterial. Respect though must be paid to the intimacy and trust that director Sascha Gerva has earned from his subjects. Technical skills can be acquired, getting subjects to open their lives is an ability that is much harder to learn and use responsibly. A+++
K, this wasn't my favorite. I guess I'm not a comfortable cynic!
No, every so-called genius is a craftsman first. They learn the basics. They study them, copy them until they are implicit. So that, when it’s time to create for themselves, they know and understand their influences.
No. I know myself. I love the narcotic family of drugs too much to allow myself to try heroin. I know I'd be instantly addicted.
is bipartisan
I throw my arms back, and then throw the typewriter towards the centre of the canal. My eyes momentarily closed as me brain fills with words -
Pinterest is become a fast growing forum for stamping inspiration.
Angela lives in Essex, and her stories regularly appear in such magazines as Take a Break's Fiction Feast, My Weekly, Woman's Weekly, Yours, The Weekly News, That's Life (Australia), People's Friend, and in the small press. Her competition successes include winning the Annual Ghost Story Competition run by Writers' News in 2006, and also two of their monthly competitions.
Change C5 to 4700pf Mica capacitors
Brian Zunker is a House Manager and is responsible for the great photo and story of the Cline family and their wonderful delivery of pull tabs. Brian enjoys promoting donations and volunteer happenings on his shifts at the Ronald McDonald House.
34. Feminine tops.
Of course, in the dead of winter, when they’re covered in snow, it’s hard to maintain the illusion, but now that the snow is melted and the grass has turned green, the statue feels vibrant again.
The party was over at that point so I went back to my room and went to sleep. Well, tried to, anyway. It turns out that Quincy’s backdoor was across the hall from my room. Yeah, I didn’t sleep very well that night. People kept running up and down the hall and shouting and all that great stuff. The next morning, Heather was kind enough to ask me how I slept and promptly admonished me for not getting a room higher up... I’ve learned my lesson, Heather!
The paper was cited in an amicus brief in the Fisher case. In briefs filed with the Supreme Court, a key, and persuasive, argument of opponents of on-campus preferences—including, as I wrote about at MTC, my UPI co-author Stuart Taylor—is that not only do these preferences violate the 14th amendment’s promise of all people receiving equal treatment under the law regardless of their race, but preferences don’t even benefit the people (minorities, in this instance) they allegedly were designed to serve. In this instance, the paper’s authors concluded that “attempts to increase representation [of minorities] at elite universities through the use of affirmative action may come at a cost of perpetuating underrepresentation of blacks in the natural sciences and engineering.”
Graphic 45 paper and this new NS image of a "Cowboy", ha, this did make me laugh. the Stars are die cut and the sentiment is by Whiff of Joy. I have added a few buttons from my stash.
for music videos. VEVO
My mother continues to live with us. She had a knee replacement in August. As part of her recovery, she decided to get a little puppy. It is a Chihuahua/Pekinese/Shih Tzu mix. She named him Teddy and he brings her much joy. Taking him for walks is big part of her exercise program. In November she made a brief trip to my brother’s house in the Chicago area.
My connection to my far away family's tradition is that I duplicate the menu every year. The aunts didn't do it on their own. They haven't yet. We also have new traditions. We get together with friends who are like family. I am no longer doing it alone. My daughters have taken over the preparation of their favorite dishes.
b) Photos must be Full Permission.
My good intentions have ground themselves (again) and I seem to do better when I have a task to complete or am doing something for someone else.
The architecture of the Museum of Fine Arts in Santa Fe, New Mexico maintains the region’s true style.
Lizz Winstead, co-creator of The Daily Show and one of today’s most hilarious comedians and insightful social critics, pens a brilliant account of how she discovered her comedic voice.
I had an opportunity to use some of the new release Stampin' Up stamps on this task, and some of my old favorites. :)
Here is what Melanoma looks like and does to you…
My mudding boots have earned their moniker when I've headed out into the bush. The trails, the dirt roads, are all but glacially flowing rivers of soaked-to-the-point-of-squishy. My gators are worn to keep my pant legs clean and dry. The snow I've encountered is slushy and dirty looking. Although the resorts are starting to ketchup on their snow-packs skiers and boarders bitch about the texture.
We see Najib threatening racial / religious violence by warning the rakyat not to even mention Islam, or else the Silat Lincah group, Perkasa and other UMNO lackeys rise up and run amok.
Freedom of forming associations and unions shall be based on a national basis, for lawful purposes and by peaceful means which are guaranteed in accordance with the terms and conditions prescribed by law.
More alone
This is kind of what I am thinking for the greenhouse section of my shed. I check the Habitat for Humanity thrift store about once a week for windows. Its getting slimmer as I think more and more people are into recycling then just going to Home Depot and getting new windows. The quality is actually better on the old windows anyway. Once my truck gets repaired I can start ranging out in search of old building materials.
It will not be a surprise for the news media. KOS has talked to news
Reviews for Project Sweet Life:
Organic Whole Leaf Stevia
God’s customized building; specially designed by Him. Also He has given you
This is not a happy post.
The 45 will be easy – I’m just hoping to be able to get at least one 75lb’er tomorrow! I was SO CLOSE tonight!
If you require any further information please contact: Northgate Payroll Helpdesk 0870 0668695
Congratulations to Laura Collmar- McGregor!! Please send an email to info@zipfizz.com with your full name and shipping address!
People say time heals all wounds. When I was nursing the wounds of being blasted by an explosion that ripped my life apart at the seams I could not fathom the confidence and contentment that I have today.
To share in the joy of a good book: An autographed copy of Return to Exile is available for an interested reader! I will randomly select one lucky person from among those that leave a comment on this post by Friday, June 1. For an additional chance, "like" the book's Facebook page here (and let me know you did so in your comment).
“How did he get your number?” I asked ‘Melia as Dane started tickling more.
By the bivouac’s fitful flame.
Crochet
Fortunately we’ve still got the knack of finding and developing talent. If Arsenal is to challenge for the title again we’ll need that upper hand, as well as a break when it comes to injuries. We need the fans to maintain their current fervour, understand the reasons why we win games and appreciate the mitigating factors when things don’t work out.
Unable to negotiate the corner they drove straight into a large tree on the pavement and all piled out of the vehicle and took flight on foot.
Once you embrace the beauty and unique quality of your natural hair texture, you can then learn the proper hair care techniques and styles that will ease the transition from relaxed to natural. Practising the tips and techniques provided here can be help to preserve the health of your hair during this transition period.
"Sorry," she answered. "I can't find places in the Falkland Islands."
Martie Olivier’s husband, Sarel, later arrived raging at the Kempton Park police station where he assaulted various police officers on duty.
I know most of it will grow back; I know that Common Road isn't a conservation imperative, and I know it probably looks worse than it is. But there's something quite brutal about all this. Something that doesn't feel right - a sense that with just a little more care, it would have made such a difference. As it is, there'll be less birdsong on my training rides this spring, and I guess this autumn I'll be going elsewhere for sloes.
Now I am wondering if it is indeed MY TURN to get seen? Or do I have to run around and check on my Aunt Betty in the stem chair too? Listen, I swear…. although I understand that I may have extended roles in my family as the big sister, the brother, the son, the pastor and the husband… SOUNDS INSANE RIGHT? Trust me though… they find a way to make me fit all of these…. nothing perverted of course via husband but they feel that I am as strong as 10 MEN so that I should do it and be okay with it….. im ready to go and now! So ready that I dont want to be bothered or sit next to anybody!! I dont want to read or be talked to…I want to be seen!!
Here are my words… the words of a mother.
Native American: 16 (1.6%)
The Forsythia wreath and Easter Lilies make the front door at The Glen cheery!
c) the use of Web 2.0 tools, as opposed to more traditional learning management systems, to deliver distance education in the primary and secondary environment;
I like reading your blogs about the minutia of life. I like reading your rants. Sometimes I agree, sometimes I don't.
Attorneys and probation officers were initially skeptical about being called into court for every minor probation violation, but the volume of work per offender has decreased over time.
I recognize God’s voice because…
And I started writing just what I'd say
03 - You Give Love A Bad Name
LAWYER: Uh. Well, I don't have a Real Estate License.
My friend from high school also had some of the same issues I was facing at home. My husband, who is a perfect overachiever, couldn’t deal with the fact that it was recommended that Jeremy go on medication. He positively Refused to even think the possibility and so this would create lots of tension. My determine was to find a solution, whatever that was. I was dealing with the teachers and with Jeremy every day, not just in the morning or at bed time. When I took Jeremy to school, the stress stopped for my husband, but not for me or his teachers. After speaking with numerous wives, I’ve discovered that the husbands don’t believe it, or Want to believe it. It appears that because men feel that they must be strong in every situation and must cope many obstacles in life, and that having a son that is facing problems is just too much to bear. Most of the dads of the boys with Sid are in denial at first. The wives tend to have to deal with finding out what the issues are all by themselves by researching, talking and finding solutions. Many of the husbands fight the wives to the end until the wife ultimately convinces her mate to “just speak with an expert”. In one case I know, the father uses the excuse, “he’s just like I was” so he assumes it is okay. Meanwhile, everyone along with his wife is going crazy having to deal with his child. My friend is of the mindset that if there Is help available, then she’s going to get it! In reality, many of these men are right, because the kid Is just like them… And if there would have been help for their own mothers way back when, then the moms more than likely would have taken it instead of suffering straight through it and of procedure it would have made everything easier on the child. They could have learned tactics that would have helped them carry on their actions, their bodies and their behavior.
Again, if any of these impressions are mistaken, I am certainly interested in learning more about your perspective. But before there is any more talk of a worrisome and probably unnecessary meeting, please read my paper.
“Uhmph. Well, you should have gotten at least fifty bucks for the carcass.”
Artwork: ethiessen1
The sugar bowls empty,
Remember when the frozen yogurt craze first began? Pinkberry made its mark in LA. They gained thousands of groupies, demand skyrocketed and thus caused the creation of many Pinkberry-wannabes. Of those “wannabes” was the more notable, Red Mango. For a while there was the debate of which was better- Pinkberry or Red Mango?
WHAT WOULD I DO WITH DARREN’S PANTS…?
At the risk of sounding self-aggrandizing, I want to read the same kind stories I want to write. I want dirty, gritty stories where people are unspeakably cruel, but act that way because of a hidden wound. Some subcutaneous tenderness, maybe. People who are easily offended and react at a gut-level rather than intellectually. I really dig writers like Neil Smith, Tom Piccirilli, Matthew Funk, Tom Franklin, the guys who write real people doing really awful things, written really well. This is an old conversation, but the idea that crime/mystery/horror/whatever writing is, or should be, somehow sub-par to Booker Prize prose is offensive and just fucking stupid. Words are all we have to represent ourselves and they should be treated accordingly.
One morning bright and early
“If the ultimate source of suffering is ignorance, then there must be a counterforce to ignorance, and that is the understanding of reality.”
(I used 'Tacky Glue' and stitched the tail from the flower around the band too for extra strength).
Wash dishes only once a day. Instead of pre-rinsing, use paper towels to wipe leftover food from the dishes. Use paper plates to reduce the number of dishes that have to be washed.
Previously, we used the dbm-gorm-diff command to generate a migration. This time we’ll focus on writing one from scratch. So we want to add a new column like in part 2, but we also want to add a not null constraint. So we write the following in a new file: grails-app/migrations/add-date-created-to-post.groovy
Have I ever complained about the song and dance an expat has to do to get a passport renewed while living abroad?
· Rae Bareli coach factory manufactured 10 coaches in 2011-12; phase-II of the factory
3. Service to the Community: Is dedicated to making our community a better place to work and live. Displays a sense of concern and responsibility toward our coworkers, workplace and communities as a whole.
We are expected to caddis hatch to reignite as the week rolls on and the river bottom warms _ we will keep y’all updated
Here is a previous sketch I made in the fall now in color. I call it Cozy Evening.
Lebanon bologna
Finally able to sleep in just a little bit, we wake up around 9:15 to head downstairs to the buses for our Cape Malay Cooking Safari, as planned by SAS. I was apprehensive about signing up from the beginning because truthfully Im not really a cooker and my family isnt into exotic dishes. But, the idea of being able to be taught how to cook by an authentic South African tipped the balance in favor and I had applied. Later, we found out that the Malay people are actually descendents of Indonesian slaves who were brought to Cape Town hundreds of years ago to reclaim the land that Cape Town is housed upon. They are also Muslim.
She took off her flannel night gown and white cotton granny panties and “assumed the position”.
The advertising specialist asserts that great advertising is the answer.
We want stability in the Middle East to protect oil supplies. At the same time we worry that the autocratic regimes there won't be able to deliver that stability and that their oppression of their own peoples runs counter to our values. We want to help, but like George Clooney in "Three Kings" we always have one eye on the gold (or, in this case, the oil). Divided attention makes us less effective than we could be.
Property – Allocation
What is Oracle Cards?
The male friend said in his statement at the time that they were "going hard” and he did not know if they bumped the light or it just fell off.
Make a portrait of the bell. The biggest issue here will be making sure you have a good background that is not cluttered or ugly. Use an open aperture like f/2.8 or use the “portrait” setting on your point and shoot. Make sure to get the bell sharp and get the background blurred. This is one place I might use a flash, even if it is bright out. Try it with a flash and without.
Nothing, not a dog gone thing, a dud. I got so mad I just kept pulling the thing and finally came to the conclusion his chain was not attached to his motor. I wore myself out before I came to that conclusion.
1/2 c. butter, softened (do not try to use the light versions of margarine- they do not mix up the same in frosting)
Add mixture to broth. Heat till thickened.
The first væmpires appeared around 1500 AD. The creatures—warm-blooded with a hunger for cold vampire blood—were quickly dismissed as anomalies; poor, unfortunate victims of some horrible new mutagen or, perhaps, lingering atomic contamination. As the situation not only persisted, but grew, world leaders stubbornly refused to acknowledge that any problem existed.
All day she's in the kitchen cooking, and here and there we jump in and help her, though for the most part she wants it to be a solo operation. She takes pride in her ability to single-handedly cater multiple feasts. There's chicken, lamb, beef with yams, and turkey, potatoes with prunes, matzah ball soup, glazed carrots, broccoli, beets, and Brussels sprouts. Charoset too (apples, bananas, nuts, wine, cinnamon, and a little honey mixed together in a blender). Am I leaving anything out? Salads, can't forget those. Anything else? Probably.
I will recommend this one again and again.
Boy Cried Wolf are only concerned in one thing, making their mark on music. However long it takes, giving up is not an option. “We’re in no rush, we’re all in our 30s we’ve not an NME band we’re a real band made up of real songwriters, we really know who we are and exactly what we want to do are we’re prepared to take all the time in the world to make sure we are bulletproof.”
Bring vegetable broth and salt to a boil in a pot. Add oil. Lower heat to simmer. Add the polenta in a slow steady stream, stirring constantly with a whisk. Whisk for about 5 minutes, until polenta is thickened. Keeping heat low, cover and let cook for 20 more minutes or so, stirring occasionally.
The Red Devil Lounge 1695 Polk Street
of a thought
Necklaces : Gifted
I HATE it when people come to us and say “what are you waiting for?”, it makes me queasy to say the least. While ‘when are you doing it?’ is a positive question, the former is a subtle criticism of our choices totally uncalled for. I joke when I get uncomfortable, sometimes I bark, sometimes I bite, but it always leaves me fuming.
Dessert is not always served at the end of every meal.
We turned off the main road, went across a bridge and followed a very steep single track road up to the hotel. Chris pulled up, parked the car and we all got out...the two boys stretched their legs and talked about how nice it was to be out the car...I was looking at the hotel. To say it was run down would be an understatement...the courtyard was covered in weeds, the windows filty and the curtains surrounding them were thin and ragged. It was at that point I spotted a creepy wee man staring/peering at us out one of the downstairs windows. He was thin, pale to the point that he was more blue than white (and I thought Chris was bad!) and had a shock of bright orange hair on the top of his head...he was also not blinking! All I could see was this pale, unfriendly, floating face staring at us through the window (It was dark behind him so I couldn't see the rest of him). Now, I don't know about you but I have watched many a horror movie in my time and this would be the point when I would be shouting at the TV 'Don't be so bloody stupid...get back into the car and drive!' so I was about to suggest that we do just that when a huge bearded bloke opened the front door. He looked at us and we looked at him...then he grunted (seriously, no hi or smile or anything...just a grunt!) and went back in the hotel. We, and I am ashamed to admit this, then did a very British thing...he had acknowledged that we were there so it would have been rude (!!) of us to just leave. We walked up to the front door, pausing only to note that the welcome mat was a piece of astroturf (I am not making this up!), and entered the darkest, dingiest, dampest corridor that I have ever been in in my life! It also absolutely stunk of wet dog...which, when it appeared, was huge, matted and the friendliest thing we encountered! As we entered the corridor we saw the bearded man go through a door at the end of it so we followed him (Sheep? Us? I don't know what your talking about!). Chris was leading, I was in the middle and Tom was bringing up the rear. The wee creepy man had now appeared to the left of us and was just standing in the doorway...still staring...still not blinking and I was thinking 'This is it! We are going to be chopped up into little pieces and our car will be dumped with 'the others' in a ditch somewhere'. As we walked down the corridor we could hear faint music playing from somewhere and it got louder the further down we went.
In looking at the last couple of days we have seen that different motivations drive us to God and for Jacob it was family issues and problems. We have seen family issues do drive us to seek the presence of God and they push us to seek direction from God about them. We also talked about the paradox that we must give up the most precious things in order get all that God has for us. There are some tough things to learn but if you wrestle with God you will find that God does not want things easy for us but He simply wants us to hold on tight to Him through all we go through.
New ring styles are on their way for 2012. We have always loved the look of silver settings with wood, and now we have found a great style that we think is real style and elegance. These are beautiful Dress Rings.
As a note for those who are praying for me, I have a recheck appointment on Tuesday in Michigan. I really would like to be feeling much better by Monday when I head up there. Brandon will be going with me since Scott is traveling in the South on furlough meetings. He may just end up doing most of the driving. Watch out Detroit!
There still remains a few things to do. Mainly on the wall opposite the bed.
Battleships have claustrophobic little rooms and labyrinthine passageways where you lose track of which direction is fore and aft. The bathrooms offered no privacy, and there was only a tiny surgical room, even though the movie they showed described several of these ships having enormous holes blown out of them.
The bombing of an Israeli embassy car in Delhi threatens India’s diplomatic maneuvers between Israel and Iran, and has put India’s discreetly nurtured ties with Israel since 1992 through a severe test. Those who are attracted to Israel’s depiction of Iran as a terrorist threat to world peace would do well to read historian Mark Perry’s account, revealing that Israel is recruiting, and collaborating with, terrorist groups in a secret war with Iran. That low-level conflict is spreading. Israel’s latest reaction should be seen in the light of Perry’s revelations.
So far in HEX we have a well laid out culture with a strong historical backstory and it is apparent that Fleisher isn't making this up one issue at a time. I'm enjoying it, I really am (and I was back in 1985)
One thing that I love about this set is the dynamic it brings out from the Headsparks LP tracks ("Atari"/"Grain"/"Decatur"/"Sky City"), in the live setting. Headsparks is my least favorite Seam LP, because I think the recording itself is too murky/poor to appreciate; here, the songs really come to life and explode out of the players, greatly increasing my appreciation of these tracks.
Pete sat in the chair he always came in. Aunt Kelly was typically sitting next to him, eating and feeding him simultaneously. He couldn’t stop shaking, as if the room was forever freezing to him only. Sometimes Aunt Kelly left him to go talk with family. I could understand. Humans are social creatures. When she left, I waved to Pete. Looking as if he was Hercules attempting to lift up our world, he waved back. I wonder how that feels. To see your hands shaking and know that your life, from here on out, would be a trial that no one could understand. To try to walk and fall down more often than not.
In a piece on festschrifts for the LRB (subscriber only) - in this case for once left-leaning historians (or two of these) - Susan Pedersen notes they exemplify 'how through some opaque process of affiliation and acculturation, historians defending empiricist methods and resisting monocausal explanations float to the top of elite institutions' (32).*
1. Entrance Hall. This is where the destrachen arrived. The room contains the magically sealed passage to the collapsed upper floors, as well as a magically trapped door to Laleth's chambers. The destrachen triggered a powerful enthrallment spell when it investigated the room. If the destrachen is attacked or otherwise disturbed the spell wears off and it attacks anyone in sight. The room is covered with elven warnings and magical abjuration spells that can be deciphered by PC's with the appropriate skills.
organization for which Suzanne works.
Meryl Streep, Julie & Julia
April 30, 2012 – Weight: 133 / Size: 8
A small glazed ceramic bowl used for making this dessert, other desserts and other food that’d look good in a small bowl. Think soufflé or cocktail shrimps!
she doesn't listen to much contemporary music). She's non-committal
We did burgers - but with lean ground beef and smaller (thinner) whole grain hamburger buns and a salad instead of baked beans, chips and dip.
Everyone, back then, wanted out of this world
The campaign had worked, said the Scottish government, with a significant response and more than 108,000 people signing up to the register, outperforming the rest of the UK by a factor of three.
The Divide by Nicholas Evans. I don’t love it BUT I definitely don’t hate it. I luke-warm like it. After I found out the writer was not from the area he wrote about, I was skeptical. Write what you know is what I always hear. But it was well done. I’m always amused that when someone dies in a book, all the books that I’ve read have been put in like Montana or Idaho. But kudos to Evans, decent book.
“The democracies of the Versailles Entente helped the victory of Hitler by their vile oppression of defeated Germany. Now the lackeys of democratic imperialism of the Second and Third Internationals are helping with all their might the further strengthening of Hitler’s regime. Really, what would a military bloc of imperialist democracies against Hitler mean? A new edition of the Versailles chains, even more heavy, bloody and intolerable. Naturally, not a single German worker wants this. To throw off Hitler by revolution is one thing; to strangle Germany by an imperialist war is quite another. The howling of the “pacifist” jackals of democratic imperialism is therefore the best accompaniment to Hitler’s speeches. “You see,” he says to the German people, “even socialists and Communists of all enemy countries support their army and their diplomacy; if you will not rally around me, your leader, you are threatened with doom!” Stalin, the lackey of democratic imperialism, and all the lackeys of Stalin – Jouhaux, Toledano, and Company – are the best aides in deceiving, lulling, and intimidating the German workers.”
surface: smooth
In preparation for running Wampus Country via G+, I'm trying to get a bunch of half-formed house-rules out of my head on onto the page where they can be seen. I'm going to push through several subjects in quick blogposts, then try to assemble that info on a 'page' or in a pdf or something.
½ tsp ground cloves
Coffeeshophorrors
Just precious!
Yuri.
I don't know the answers to these questions for sure. But I do know that He's given little Mei a strength and adaptability and resilience far beyond what most kids I know possess. We've certainly seen that over the past five months.
selected as one of the winners of their Commercial Flooring Design Award Winners!
I was thinking of Easter and the seasons partly because of The Morville Hours, which I have been reading with Cath over at Read-Warbler. I just finished the chapter "Terce", which is about April and May, in Morville, the garden, and the land around Morville in Shropshire, UK. I didn't know where the colour purple comes from and why it's used on vestment robes for Easter for the priests and ministers. I was raised a Catholic, and Katherine Swift is rediscovering her Catholic roots at Morville, because of the nearby Benedictine Abbey. She has based The Morville Hours on The Book of Hours, as it was the book by which so many lay people marked the hours of the day, in medieval times. Here is an image from Les Tres Riches Heures de duc du Berry, which Swift also discusses in her book.
Just for giggles, let's do some math. There are 1920 ounces of beer in a standard half barrel keg. (I know the half barrel keg is 15.5 gallons. I am assuming some loss from service. I may be overestimating.) There are 320 6 ounce pours in the keg. Going for a buck a pop, that means Kupros Bistro will sell that keg for $320. At $3 for 8 ounces, they would sell the keg for $720. And at $29 ($45-$14(for the burger) - $3(assuming the average customer will have three beers after their meal) for 12 ounces they would have made $4640. I don't know what the cost of a keg of Pliny the Younger costs, but I guesstimate about $200 from the distributor, and around $150 from the brewery. So that first event would have netted them $4440 in profit from Pliny alone!
Your cooperation will contribute to a safe, healthy and litter-free coastal environment for everyone to enjoy.
In an orange seeking frenzy, I picked up the Sleek Sunset palette from my local Superdrug.
Be sure you check out all the other amazing design team creations and all the challenge details at the Young Crafters Unite! blog including the amazing prize up for grabs.
801-359-4301
Surprisingly enough, not all is lost. If anything, bookstores are reverting to where they were way back in the 80s. The local bookstores are once more blossoming. They can become important members of their communities by offering a knowledgeable staff (when was the last time you found one of those in Borders?) and author events that highlight local and national works.
:: I haven't mentioned it much lately, but knitting has become a daily ritual. I feel bereft if I don't get my daily fix with my needles. I'm spending more time on Ravelry than I am reading blogs. And I finally got round to posting a finished project on my Ravelry page. I'm now knitting this with this yarn. So nearly finished, and it's beautiful. There are several other projects on the go, too.
4.(1) The owner or person in control of a public place or employer in respect of a workplace may designate part of an outdoor area of the premises as an area in which smoking is permitted.
But just 69 miles southeast of us Cullman was hit
After we won the first game against our fourth set of opponents, filming was stopped for the day. I was taken back to my hotel room for the night. I didn’t get any sleep that night because I was so excited. I was back at the studio at 7. I was exhausted. Jessica had spent the night in the hotel, too. She was from L.A., but they put her up in the hotel that night because they didn’t want to take a chance on her being late, or not showing up the next day.
Mountain Sun Pub & Brewery Justice
Yet, I think most students need help. The bright ones are probably the top 10% of the cohort, so it’s left to the 90% of students who are not as talented and have to make up for it through hard work. There’s where tuition comes in – then comes the question, is private home tuition better or going for classes in a tuition centre better?
Peplum: A short flared, gathered, or pleated strip of fabric attached at the waist of a woman’s jacket, dress, or blouse.
The drivers training classes offered by SafeWay driving school make learning a great learning experience for the learners. We are one of the best driver education and training companies, and our driving school offers top-ranked and convenient courses that make learning a great experience for student drivers.
The Times repeats the canard, promoted by the Web site Outside.in, that Clinton Hill is the “bloggiest” neighborhood in America, citing especially the "ubiquity" of Brownstoner. As I wrote, a large plurality of the entries Outside.in listed as "Clinton Hill" that I examined concerned Atlantic Yards and came from No Land Grab. (More criticism.)
The police having entered the communal block they heard the fighting and called for more resources. Officers in a public order van with riot shields entered the flat and used force to stop the attack, by which time the man had numerous serious stab and slash wounds. As the police entered the room, he was busy driving the knife into the victim’s chest, causing a punctured lung. He was taken by ambulance to hospital where the A&E consultant told the police to start a murder enquiry because he was certain the man would die. In addition to puncturing his lung, an artery in his arm had been severed.
I thought about posting something more Ash Wednesday appropriate today, maybe something about writerly Lenten sacrifices or whatnot, but honestly, the past four days were such a bummer that I needed some cheering up. Nothing screams Mardi Gras weekend like staying home and cleaning. *yawn*
Sooyoung tried to release Jonghyun’s grib, but it seemed fail because Jonghyun was so much stronger than her.
Amazing as Mexico was, this was my fave part of the trip. We did some of the classics: went to the pharmacy & made inappropriate jokes about products, quoted favorite movies while eating papa-johns, talked about how much the baby looks like his parents, except he's much much cuter than their ugly mugs.
* Copic Markers (colours listed below in post)
Get The Perfect Pair: The newest addition to the PURE STYLE Girlfriends line of products, Shape-a-Cup will give you the youthful shape of perky breasts, no matter what your age. Shape-a-Cup is a thin gel bra insert that simultaneously lifts and shapes your breasts. These comfortable inserts create a flawless look that is nothing short of perfect. This revolutionary design wraps upward to shape your breast from all angles.
Slight spoilerish part here. Arya got captured. In the book she, Gendry and one or two others escaped only to be captured a day or so later by a team led by the man mountain. Anyway, that aside, I think in the book, Arya actually killed someone in this battle, where as in the show, she has still yet to take a life. What will be the significance of this?
every time i go to leave a comment somewhere, cassie already has.
The picture that inevitably presents itself in view of what is known, is of men like John Jacob Astor. master of scores of millions. Benjamin Guggenheim of the famous family of bankers; Isador Strauss, merchant prince: William T. Stead, veteran journalist; Major Archibald W. Butt. soldier; Washington Roebling, noted engineer — of any or all of these men stepping aside and bravely, gallantly remaining to die that the place he otherwise might have filled could perhaps be taken by some sabot shod, shawl enshrouded, illiterate and
Peder Jensen aka Fraudman formerly Fjordman has refused to attend as a witness in the Breivik trial.
I would like to blame lack of oxygen, but I might be this scatterbrained all the time.
On modern OS maps nowhere is recorded as ‘wolf hole craig’. However, there are other possible sites for ‘Woolf-hole-craig’ among the placenames which contain the ‘wolf’ element.
Down at the reserve we’re very excited to have two European Storks who’ve just arrived from Pensthorpe in Norfolk. They’re a breeding pair who’ve just come of age. They’re getting used to their new home and will be out in the reserve for visitors to see in a couple of weeks.
1745. Charles Stuart, known to history as Bonnie Prince Charlie lands in Scotland and raises the flag of rebellion in an effort to reclaim the Stuart patrimony, the throne of Great Britain.
So anyhoo … That's how my meeting went this morning. We all agreed (and minuted) that a pen is a pen and that anyone calling it a "pigment liner" is a buttfucking moron.
Thank you, for everything, Mr. Sendak.
(2) “American Energy Independence,” Ron Bengtson, AmericanEnergyIndependence.com, September 2010, http://www.americanenergyindependence.com/aei-intro.pdf
With "The Hunger Games" in mind, I've added a couple of new books to my favorites page. They are dystopian-like and very good, I think.
This week's words:
I knew this one was around. I just didn’t realize how easy it could actually me. Seriously, I mean know some color, know some sports and be able to talk right? I think this should have been advertised more to children and not just ex-athletes. Also, why in the world is Joe Buck allowed to speak on television? Anybody? Yeah, nobody else knows either.
I think snow is fucking great. I love it. I love the silence. I love it because only the stupidest of cunts is out on the roads and what very little noise they make is deadened by the blanket of corpse-faced white. This city, this Town of the Ford, it talks too fucking much. Talks, moans, bitches, screams and fucking howls. The snow has got her pillow held lightly over the face of this agonised terminal case and its constant pain. Snow won't kill the town, but it'll shut it the fuck up for a few days. And don't tell me it isn't beautiful. Tom said it. The Heart of Saturday Night, Track 1, listen to the whole song. Now there's something for you to do with your iPhone when you're stuck in a four hour traffic jam.
ISBN: 978-0-316-03627-6
We have GDT positions from September onwards. Please add GDT to your entry if you’d like to be considered or email me (Lisa) at papercraftingjourney@gmail.com I believe in giving everyone a chance to shine so you’re guaranteed a spot of you add GDT to your entry.
I also used the chisel to mortise out the hinges for our new pantry door last fall. It’s the same idea – just trace the hinge, then chisel it out. It doesn’t have to be perfect – it’s covered in the end!
Chinese New Year is round the corner, this call for a time of family bonding. Not just my wife, Angel(daughter), Kenzo(my son) and me, but the greater family as a whole, my dad, mum, brother and sister with their kids.
Dualizm (Glow Tampa)
The political position of the analysis is broadly in sympathy with Trotsky’s Left Opposition, but to my knowledge he did not actively cooperate with the Trotskyists. He did know Victor Serge and wrote the preface for the original edition of Serge’s Men in Prison (published in France in 1930), which is unfortunately not included in the English translation by Richard Greeman.
So, having seen CERN I have setting. But the story then evaporated, because our guide told us stuff and the disillusionment monkeys came swinging in, the basic core concept of the story was rubbish.
Two weeks ago, this was my garden bed:
Everything rested on my shoulders weighing me down and pain continued to batter at me like a twig on a turbulent sea. I pinched the bridge of my nose. If it has to be seafood, then I at least want a shark that we can fry in the pan or sauté with butter. It’s been two months since we had shark. Anything but stupid catfish, crab, and shrimp.
He worries she doesn’t move at all, looking down the table.
“Neither. But I’m beginning to wonder why she set me up to this.”
“The London Olympics is a major terror target, and British officials have been working for years on a security program that is projected to cost the city over $896 million, at the same time it is cutting major services for the poor and elderly.”
hundreds of pages, one clacking letter struck at a time.
–you like lots of concurrent abilities (meaning, 24 abilities at once), or complex UI
And as I go through my life, I will wish for her, his wife
I discovered that I was in the midst of creating a situation of resentfulness between Mister and I. After a week, I had been able to understand the real issue, and was ready to discuss it with Mister. He was shocked to find out that I felt I had been in trouble. This particular response of mine is so foreign to him, that he does not recognize it. He would never treat his own adult children that way, so he has no concept of any adult feeling like they are in “trouble”.
Gidday from Australia, my name is Emma. I have been scrap booking for nearly 9 years now. I am both a digital and traditional scrapbooker and absolutely love both disciplines.
our room attendant loved making little towel creatures for us - we thought they were hilarious!
Mabelle, wishing you the best birthday ever. I feel so lucky to have met and worked with you over this past year. You are such a kind and talented artist and person, a real class act. It's a pleasure and an honor to design with your sweet images. I hope your day is as fabulous as you are! Big hugs my friend!
I bang my head on my desk a few times in despair.
Original Screenplay: Midnight in Paris
Irezumi is a form of Japanese tattooing. Literally translated it means piercing or stabbing the skin with blue or green. Irezumi may possibly go back to the paleolithic times, as far as 10,000 BC. Simple cord like markings on paleolithic man are thought to be tattoos. There is still much debate about this. In the Yayoi period, 300 BC to 300 AD Irezumi was prevalent and talked about by Chinese visitors. The tattoos of this time period were thought to have spiritual and status meanings. By the Kofun period, 300 AD to 600 AD the symbolism behind tattooing or Irezumi had started to turn. As in Rome, tattoos were now beginning to be used as a punishment on criminals to mark them.
Your friend in fermented corn,
You: Yeah! You wanna go somewhere and fuck?
8) Good Girls Never Change the World: Part 2 Esther more closely resembles the monarchs favourite prostitute than she does his married-in-a-church-before-God-and-all-our-friends-in-a-white-dress wife.
I am so excited to finally tell you all about her and our little endeavor.
Me: uhhh, baby that's dangerous.
Welcome to the Be-Attitudes Faith Blog Hop! Every month we choose a theme with which to honor Christ and become closer to Him. We then create a project to reflect that theme and boldly post it on our blogs so that the whole world sees that even our talents belong to Him! This month we have chosen the Beatitudes found on Mathew 5:3:12 and we invite you to hop through our blogs to see the Lord’s Glory manifested through the work of our hands and the stories He has written in our lives. If you arrived from Vicki's blog, you are in the right place. If you just happened to land here, make sure that you hop on over to www.mypapertreehouse.blogspot.com to begin the journey. Know that we have been praying for you and hope that the Lord would bring you just a bit closer to Himself…
While I was outside taking pictures, a UPS truck started to lumber up our driveway. Tara and Madeline screamed and ran into the woods so he wouldn't see how hideous they looked. Silly girls!!
Your mum loved flowers (name a woman who doesn’t)
Add enough salt and a dash of lemon juice (this prevents the rice from sticking to each other).
Bleak House
There was no mistaking the hissed curse that whispered through the net of the Sherim to him. "I'll make a light. Watch for it going out."
That’s how they became the best of friends.
I want to cum, but I should relax and enjoy (HUH??). I try, and I do slow down my breathing and try to slow myself. Master stops and pulls out my large toy and starts it vibrating and thrusting in...just enough to get me right to the edge. He says,,,,6 hard thrusts and you may cum. He starts with one slow hard one, the two..another slow and hard one,
Hello, my name is Brandon, and I'm addicted to Netflix.
So then I announced that we are moving forward with the ORIGINAL decision from me. He practically jumped out of his seat in protest. We both started speaking at the same time, and he let me go first. I told everyone that the original decision has been approved by ALL stakeholders as well as the President and I have documentation to support it all. He argued with me for just a little bit, and then dropped it. As soon as the meeting was over, he stomped through the door to who-knows-where and I-don't-care.
The problem was, the Sugarcubes couldn't help themselves. They still can't. Einar appeared in New York at the New Music Seminar muttering, "Don't drink and drive... if you haven't got a car." Björk described the universe through the eyes of a child: "If the sun had loads of hairs and you could hug it, it would be really nice."
So there you have it. Those are the 20 schools that have waited the longest for an NCAA bid. Will one of them break through this year? Maine and Buffalo look like the best bets, but you wouldn’t really want to place a wager on any of them.
“Holy” Death, a statue of a skeleton garbed in a hooded robe and holding a scythe, is prayed to and given gifts to assure the prayers are answered. The greater the favor requested, the greater the gift required. For something really big, only human blood will do, and plenty of it.
And of course, it’s certainly against the Catholic code of ethics to twist the evidence from historical scholars and then use that twisted analysis to falsely accuse a priest of subterfuge. Here is Bob’s reply to my demonstration that he totally misconstrued what Fr. Olivieri meant by “devastating mobility” (sometimes also phrased “devastating motion”):
Afterwards we headed out to Nodding Head Brewery and Restaurant for some food and merriment! I was exhausted by the time I got home, but it was well worth it because now I have wonderful memories of friends and fun.
I’ll die on white sheets and Majid will wake up and find me. And my soul will be released, and I’ll be back in the womb with Ben Ho. I smooth my hair, fold my hands over my chest and wait to die, but I become so calm at this thought that my heartbeat returns to its normal, sluggish state, and I don’t die. So I get up and have a cigarette.
For those of us that do have DID, let’s think about these very thoughts and concerns for a bit. Let us suppose, for just a moment, that we are subconsciously faking it for some reason for which we can’t imagine. I say “subconsciously” because most of us with DID that do say these things to ourself and our therapist don’t feel like it would be something we did on purpose. We just think we’ve gone crazy and this has just happened. But let’s just consider the subconsciously faking it possibility for a minute.
So I have returned (more or less). Will you see a revival of the weekly martial arts news? Maybe more of my overly-long posts on martial arts topics that only I care about? More shilling of products?
Nope, none of these beat out a record that exuded so much undeniable charm and misanthropic enthusiasm that I forgave almost unlistenable production. The volume on each track varies. There is zero bass. The vocals are crackly and indecipherable. The drums make no sense. It sounds so freaking kvlt! I thought I found that off-putting?
To sit and listen to someone slander tens of thousands of their fellow citizens, to hear the hypocrisy behind asking for their votes while working to deny them basic rights, is abhorrent beyond endurance. They cannot claim to know what is best for all citizens, because they have demonstrated they do not have empathy for or understanding of all those citizens. Anyone who cannot see the crippling inconsistencies in their ideology, and expects me to ignore those inconsistencies, has no business running the country.
Secretly, I had been elated. In the year that I have been attending the nursery I have not seen the babies, not since those initial two weeks or two days or whatever it was. We weren't allowed near them unless sent specifically for punishment and I was a good girl, I obeyed the rules.
To be honest. I was not so sure about the idea of a piano bar. I was thinking old music. Show tunes. Songs I had never heard of. Not that there is anything wrong with that. It just wasn't my idea of a fun evening. And now. I must say. I was rather pleasantly surprised. More than pleasantly. It was a great evening.
Add the vegetable broth, turn the heat down to low, cover the pot and simmer for 15 minutes.
Now I am all for free speech, even of such falsehoods and outrageous and despicable fabrications as what Louis Farrakhan has just spewed forth here. That said, how does this fool have any credibility with anybody other than those that want to believe these lies based on their faith in such things and an abject hatred of all things American?
Oakshire Brewing - Daily Dose Summer Ale - Oakshire draws its malt bill from across the gamut: Rahr 2-row, Castle Pilsner, Briess Carapils and Great Western Munich. By contrast, the hop bill is simple: a light dose of Nuggets in the boil and two shots of Amarillo in the finish. To complement the hops, the brewers added orange, lemon and grapefruit peel and some hibiscus flower and lemongrass for a light, crisp brew with a slightly fruity note.
So, come time to release a new pattern, I must assess whether to bite the proverbial bullet and write everything out "longhand" as well as provide charts. Sometimes, like for Shetland Garden, I feel it would confuse and not enlighten, so it is left out. Sometimes it is the right thing to write it out.. and then there is always the worry that with more words on the pages, there are more possibilities for published errors, every designer's nightmare.
Awesome. And Australian. Ish. Pretty much.
This pavilion, a temporary structure constructed on an abandoned parking lot and open until June, is a move by Natura to capture new clients using its long-held philosophy of making the brand part of the lives of their customers. It’s brilliant. The young people people who attend clients in the pavilion are very well trained in both Natura’s products and its corporate philosophy. They’re personable almost to a fault and among the best sellers I’ve seen.
Same technique using Distress Ink, Peeled Paint and I tried using Aged Mahogany Distress Stain (instead of the stamp pad)and it worked just fine. I put a little puddle of the stain on my craft sheet and worked it onto the tag using a Blending Tool (Ranger).
There has been a lot of discussion going on in various websites and forums about our proposed system, over the last couple of days. Sadly, most of this discussion has revolved around its legality and/or the impact of Mercury on the environment, rather than its merits and the technical reasons behind it.
IV.
There is a very happy Abbie here in school that is about as calm and collected as a Tigger on speed. The man can’t sit still, and breaks into big inappropriately spontaneous grins at the worst of times.
3) I don’t have an Ag degree, and actually feel a bit slighted because NACE, DoL, and Newsweek didn’t even bother to address the prospects for the millions of us with our undergrad degrees in mathematics and Masters from seminary.
9. Facebook or twitter? both, but facebook is my favorite.
This has been a long week.
-1 4 oz can diced green chilies
- Wang Zhen to Deng Xiaoping
Winner : Maui - Imperial Coconut Porter
John West was named after he got to eat the good tuna (it was Sirena actually - so full of unfishy deliciousness that it makes me understand how someone can think that tuna is chicken).
Convention refugees are people who are outside their home country or the country where they normally live, and who are unwilling to return because of a well-founded fear of persecution based on:
I didn't even expect that I will have to re-measure these settings and I even cut out and started my peplum top, and when it came to side seams- well, I was seriously ticked off by that. Luckily it is still possible to fix the muslin ( as it looks ok to actually wear in public), but I have been spending a lot of hours learning CAD pattern drafting instead.
Fresh herb ideas: Italian parsley, oregano, basil, dill, tarragon, chives (if no green onion).
I heard Him again there, just today.
You may find that there are some people who do not support the book, but also don't support the petition. They believe that this is censorship and that free speech should apply to anything, even the promotion of child abuse. And they are right! The government has NO place censoring this book. This petition, however, is asking a PRIVATE business to stop selling it, because it violates the business's own policy of what they will carry. This is Amazon customers informing Amazon of their demands. It's no different than a customer speaking with the owner of a local bookstore about their choice to carry a book that is dangerous and reprehensible.
I am currently waiting for the chimp to give me his phone. I sincerely hope that no woman in my acquaintance has sent me an indecent photo of herself. Because if she has, Doctor Spank will be paying a visit to Bottomland.
Oh and have you been to:
This blog has its downsides. One of the biggest is that I feel duty-bound to try new beers, which, since I don't actually drink a lot of beer, means I don't drink old beers as often as I'd like. However, prompted by my post on the forthcoming cherry Adam, I decided to eschew Raven Mad, Full Sail's new doppel, and the new batch of winter seasonals and instead grabbed an Adam. It's been a year or more since my last; far too long.
When exploring the symbolism of Alice’s eating and drinking of unusual substances in Wonderland, for instance, The Initiation of Alice sets up an analogy between the reception of the Holy Eucharist and the imbibing of psychedelic mushrooms.
It's still cold but it seems Spring is finally here. At least the allergy season has officially started this past weekend, and I'm eating Claritin.
Another Somebody done somebody wrong song...B.J. Thomas
no sudden moves
"Daughter, Daughter, bring me my purse!"
I will probably mention many times how bad my ADD is, especially when it comes to decorating. As much as I love white, there just seemed to be too much of it all mismashed together. And the one place I decided to add some pattern was curtains. I had my heart set on the Hutton Drapes from Pottery Barn, I loved how pretty they were. Of course they were way more than I wanted to spend, because I will likely change them again. I was determined to find them cheaper and I had to look no further than Urban Outfitters, which is where I found these.
Other end of the room. Really dislike the desk, and the reason we have to have short curtains, but Bill's not too excited about a new desk. This is sort of his desk so it has to meet all his requirements. So still trying to convince him we need a new one.
But this is a beer review, not a pub review, so let's get on with it.
“696 – Miley Cyrus/The Strokes”
I am doing my best to give you information from sources you may not see or read ordinarily and tossing in my own thoughts here and there.
Sadly, there’s not a lot out there for them; besides a few adult women in their lives that they can turn to in need, there is almost nothing in mainstream society that speaks to young women about their growth and desires in sex positive, yet realistic and honest ways.
OK, apologies in advance for this – and maybe it’s only people who are in Beijing who’ll appreciate what I mean – but I think I’ve had my I-bloody-love-Beijing epiphany moment.
Since the art had different colorations online, I first saved them all to my computer and then brightened them and changed them to the same black and white tone in my photo editing program. Just to keep things interesting, I mixed in the sea fans (spray painted and placed in a shadow box) for texture and added some black and white photographs that I already had.
Morels are notoriously hard to find in the woods. I've known the most capable of hunters and outdoorsmen to go morel hunting with my brother, and he always out-gathers them. Special eyes, he says. Super-morel vision.
One of the things Melinda specifically mentioned wanting to do while she and Daisy were here was visiting the roof of the Duomo. This time Owen and I took the elevator while Melinda, Daisy and Laura took the stairs.
"She was the most seductive, sexual image of woman ever committed to celluloid," says filmmaker Richard Leacock in Lulu in Berlin, a documentary that includes a lengthy interview with Louise Brooks. "She was the really unrepentant hedonist, the only pure pleasure-seeker I think I've ever known."
Tuesday afternoon, on my way home from work, I went to the grocery store to stock back up on the perishables we had lost. It never crossed my mind that our regular grocery store a town over would have been affected worse than we had. Boy, was that wrong! It turned out their power had only been restored a couple of hours before I walked through the doors. The staff were working on overdrive trying to re-stock departments from the generator powered coolers and freezer where everything had been moved days before. I stood in the aisles gaping at what I saw until I finally came to my senses and snapped a few photos for posterity.
When your hands crept in to touch the secret places,
I was reminded today that it will be a long, hard haul. And, it's bound to be a journey of many regresses as I resist the urge to go with what is expected of me, always the agreeable little girl of my past. The truth of the matter is that I must stop questioning myself and looking to others for approval, to mother myself.
10- L'Evoluzione 8.12
In the past few years I have started watching the Opening Ceremonies of the Olympics, actually I probably really paid attention during Summer 08. Anywho, this year's Ceremony was great, I was impressed by the use of the fabric and projectors. It really proves what you can do with a blank canvas and how it can be transformed into something beautiful and inspiring.
Pratyush was too dumbed to say anything. Silence and only silence is moving inside the compartment. Most of the co-passengers are deep down into their dream to get a whiff of what happening around. The conversation between Mahek and Pratyush are not disturbing me to sleep, but thrilling me to be awake.
A big chunk of me wanted to explain about linking verbs, but instead I swallowed that down and said, "That's right! Where did you learn that?"
It's one of the few 'new' things that come into my home. Most of my home is filled with products-with-a-story. The dressing table belonged to my gran, the lamp you see reflected in the mirror is a dated green jade one, which has taken a coat of white paint very well! The stool at my dressing table was part of a set of 4 director's chairs sourced from the hospice years ago. I remade the seat from linen. The jug reflected in the mirror was a copper one, which has also been rejuvenated with white paint!
COURSE: 343T; SPEED: 7.8
Like a junkie, I couldn’t do it. Why is that? I knew what I was doing was wrong for me. Unhealthy. But yet still I bought the bag and proceeded to eat the whole thing.
To catch: verb. to succeed in reaching.
We were unable to obtain the
Welcome to hell!
So…. will this be a summer for checking in, changing, growing, challenging?
At some point during joke time, the check was left for Doug, the Calculator, to figure out how much each of the group owed for this weekʼs holiday feast. As Doug was doing his math thing at one end of the table, Ed Sherrettaʼs cell phone was ringing at the other end. Ed announced that the call was from Jimmy “J9er” Ridgeway who was just checking in from pool side at a Hilton Head Hotel. Paul quickly pointed out that J9er was the groupʼs 13th celebrant, stating, “Thatʼs our Judas!”
Projects accomplished so far:
OF HIS LIFE!! They had to draw one, and then they had to sculpt it and paint
I’ll know my name as it’s called again.
I’m struggling with my life at the moment. I have a responsible, well-paid job by my standards. We have a nice flat (though we could do with a bigger one). We have two lovely children, even if they do occasionally behave like monsters).
Western Conference:
And, as a consequence, good and bad become absolutes. Murder and offence are elevated to the same moral standing. Ambiguity is banished and, with it, human nature. It is divisive, the kind of attitude that generates ‘us versus them' thinking and, make no mistake, that kind of absolutism is the foundation on which authoritarianism is built.
These people are constantly calling and harrasing trying to get my credit card number for their alleged Who's Who listing. I have been contacted by several idividuals who I believe just change their names to try and confuse me to believe they're someone else. Their salesman John Braxton who I also believe to have an alias of John Waters was extremely rude and uncouth. When I spoke with their manager a woman named Sandra Gilmore she used profanity and hung the phone up on me. Please be aware of these dispicable individuals who's main goal was to obtain my credit card number to bleed a sick widow dry of what little finanaces she has left.
In the end, Ophelia can’t take it, being so young and sensitive. When her father dies through a freak accident that is part and parcel of all the plotting and lies in the play, she goes off the deep end, literally and figuratively.
